.I(P)I ~ ~o~~
~ UNIVERSITY
Indira Gandhi
National Open University
National Centre of Disabiliy Studies
MCFT-003
Counselling and Family Therapy:
Basic Concepts and
Theoretical Perspectives
•
• • .,."J
SCHOOLS OF COUNSELLING 2
/
"Education is aliberating force,and in our
age it is also a democratizing force,
cutting across the barriers of caste and
class, smoothing out inequalites imposed
by birth and other circumstances."
- Indira Gandhi
"fu~TT~ Cfil ~~ ~ llqij ~ ~ 3th:
~ cfi ~1T if <TI ""lffi ffi~?f q;1 ~ CfiT
3TI'bfR ~% I ~(f21T"-3A~ ~ ~
~ ~ crn1T(f fct!S1 ~ d laTI Cfil '~5 ~ ~
1l1~ Cfil ~ ~ ~ d3Rft% I"
- '~<!:U 1lim
/
l@J
Gignou
. THE PEOPLE'S
, UNIVERSITY
Indira Gandhi National Open University
National Centre for Disability Studies
MCFT-003
Counselling and Family
Therapy: Basic Concepts
and Theoretical
Perspectives
Block
2
SCHOOLS OF COUNSELLING AND
PSYCHOTHERAPY
UNIT 5
Psychodynamic Approaches 7
UNIT 6
Cognitive Behavioural Approaches 28
UNIT 7
Person-Centered Approaches 52
UNIT 8
Group Counselling and Other Counselling Approaches 70
/
EXPERT COMMITTEE
Prof. V.N. Rajasekharan Pillai (Chairperson)
Vice Chancellor
IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Reeta Sonawat
Dean & Head, Department of
Human Development, SNDT
Women's University, Mumbai
Prof. Shagufa Kapadia
Head, Department of Human -
Development and Family Studies
The M.S. University of Baroda
Vadodara
Dr. Rajesh Sagar
Associate Professor,
Deptt. of Psychiatry, AllMS &
Secretary, Central Mental Health
Authority of India, Delhi
Prof. Anisha Shah
. Department of Mental Health and
Social Psychology, NIMHANS,
Bangalore
Prof. Minhotti Phukan
Head, Deptt. of ,HDFS
Assam Agricultural University
Assam
Dr. Jayanti Dutta ,
Associate Professor of HDCS,
Lady Irwin College.New Delhi
Prof. Mathew Verghese
Head, Family Psychiatry Centre
NIMHANS, Bangalore
Prof. Manju Mehta
Department of Psychiatry
AIIMS, New Delhi
Prof. Rajni Dhingra
Head, Department of Human
Development
Jarnmu University, Jarnmu
Prof. Sudha Chikkara
Department of Human r
Development and Family Studies
CCS HAU, Hisar
Mrs. Vandana Thapar
Deputy Director (Child
Development), NIPCCD
New Delhi
Ms. Reena Nath
Practising Family Therapist
New DelhI .
Prof. Vibha Joslrir~ '":;r; ~:/ u. -Prof. C.RK. MUJ1hy
Director, School of Education S1RIDE
IGNOU, New Delhi IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Neerja Chadha
(Programme Coordinator)
Professor of Child Development
School of Continuing Education
IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Girishwar Misra
Department of Psychology
University of Delhi, New Delhi
Prof. Ahalya Raghuram
Department of Mental Health
and Social Psychology,
NIMHANS, Bangalore
Prof. T.B. Singh
Head, Department of Clinical
Psychology, IHBAS, New Delhi
Prof. Aruna Broota
Department of Psychology
University of Delhi
New Delhi
Dr. Indu Kaura
Secretary, Indian Association for
Family Therapy, New Delhi
Dr. Rekha Sharma Sen
Associate Professor
(Child Development), SOCE
IGNOU, New Delhi
. Mr. Sangmeshwar Rao
Producer, EMPC, IGNOU
New Delhi
Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra
(Convenor & Programme
Coordinator)
Research Officer, NCDS
IGNOU, New Delhi
Acknowledgment:
We acknowledge our thanks to Prof. Omprakash Mishra, Former PVC, IGNOU; Prof. cn Naidu, Former Director (I/c)
P&DD and Head, Nodal Unit; Dr. Hemlata, Former Director (l/c) NCDS; and Dr. Arun Banik, Director, NCDS, for facilitating
the development of the programme of study,
PROGRAMME COORDINATORS - M.Sc. (CFT) / PGDCFT
.Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra
Research Officer
,
NCDS, IGNOU, New Qelhi
Prof. Neerja Chadha
Professor of Child Development
SOCE, IGNOU, New Delhi
I
/.J
COURSE COORDINATORS
Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra
Research Officer
NCDS, IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Neerja Chadha
Professor of Child Development
SOCE, IGNOU, New Delhi
COURSE WRITERS
UnitS Dr. Poomima Bhola, Assistant Professor, Dept. of Psychiatry,
St. John's Medical College Hospital, Bangalore.
Prof. Kusum Sharma, NCERT, New Delhi.
Ms Avneet Kaur, Consultant Psychologist, New Delhi.
Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra, Research Officer, NCDS, IGNOU, New Delhi.
Unit 6
Unit 7
Unit 8
BLOCK EDITORS
Prof. Girishwar Misra
Department of Psychology
University of Delhi, New Delhi
Prof. Neerja Chadha
Professor of Child Development
SOCE, IGNOU, New Delhi
Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra
Research Officer
NCDS, IGNOU, New Delhi \
March-, 2011
© ludira Gandhi National Open University, 2011
ISBN: - 978-81-266-5213-6
All rights reserved. No part of this work may be reproduced in any form, by mimeograph or
any other means, without permission in writing from the Indira Gandhi National Open University,
New Delhi.
Further information on Indira Gandhi National Open University courses may be obtained
from the University's office at Maidan Garhi, New Delhi- 110 068 or the official website of
IGNOU at www.ignou.ac.in.
Printed and published on behalf of Indira Gandhi National Open University by Registrar,
<. MPDD.
. Laser Composed by: Rajshree Computers, V-166A, Bhagwati Vihar, (Near Sector-2, Dwarka),
Uttam Nagar. New Delhi-ll 0059
Printed by: Sahyog Press Pvt. Ltd, A-US, Mangolpuri Indl. Area, Ph-2, New Delhi-ll0041
/I
, j~.
,
i
f

, [I
BLOCK 2 SCHOOLS OF COUNSELLING
AND PSYCHOTHERAPY
The Block 2 of-Course MCFT-003 is named as "Schools of Counselling
and Psychotherapy". As the name suggests we will study various approaches
to counselling in this Block. This Block broadly includes counselling
approaches like psychodynamic approaches, cognitive behavioural
approaches, person-centered approaches, group counselling and other
counselling approaches. The Block consists of four Units.
Unit 5 is "Psychodynamic Approaches". The Unit begins with the discussion
on historical roots of psychodynamic therapy. The Unit also defines
psychodynamic psychotherapy including the assumptions of psychodynamic ,
approaches and differences between psychoanalysis and psychodynamic.
The processes in psychodynamic psychotherapy are also explained in this
Unit, which includes indications and contraindication for psychodynamic
psychotherapy and phases of psychodynamic psychotherapy like initiation
phase, middle phase and termination phase. The Unit also highlights the
evolution of short-term psychodynamic psychotherapies and types of shortterm psychodynamic psychotherapy. The differences between long-term
psychodynamic psychotherapy and short-term psychodynamic psychotherapy
are also described in detail. At the end, the Unit acquaints you with
knowledge on efficacy and effectiveness of psychodynamic psychotherapy.
Unit 6 is on "Cognitive Behvioural Approaches". The Unit begins with
the history of-cognitive behavioural therapy. Further, the Unit explains
the concept of cognitive behvioural therapy which includes Rational Emotive
Behaviour Therapy (REBT) by Ellis and its application to family therapy.
Cognitive Therapy by Aaron Beck is also discussed in detail, in this Unit.
It includes basic principles of cognitive therapy, genesis of the problem,
homework/assignment and the importance of structure. The Unit also
acquaints you 'with the knowledge of Donald Meichenbaum's Cognitive
Behaviour Modification (CBM). The constructivist perspective is described
in this approach. Therapist's function and role are also explained in this
Hna. All these approaches has some differences and similarities which are
discussed in detail, further the differences of CBT from other therapies
arealso explained. After studying this Unit you will know that what types
of problems can be addressed by this approach. Further, cognitive
behaviuoral approached are critically analysed with the merits and limitations
of CBT. To make the CBT more understandable the case illustration of
A-B-C-D is explained in the end of this Unit
/ \
-,
)
Unit 7 entitled "Person-centered Counselling". The Unit begins with the
introduction, and assumptions in person-centered counselling. Further, it
acquaints you with the evolution of person-centered approach in various
stages like stage 1: nondirective (1940 - 1950), stage 2: client-centered
(1950 - 1961), and stage 3: person-centeredt lvo l - present). Major
concepts of person-centered approach are also discussed in this Unit such
as actualizing tendency, self-concept, organismic valuing process and need
for positive regard. The unit further explained the goals and conditions
for person-centered counselling. Core conditions for growth like congruence,
empathic understanding, and unconditional positive regard are also discussed
(
/
in detail. The Unit also acquaints you with knowledge of strategies for
providing the care. At the end of the Unit, limitations and criticism of
person-centered counselling is explained.
Unit 8,is on "Group Counselling and Other Counselling Approaches". The
Unit begins with the introduction of group counselling which includes
meaning of groups, types of groups, multi-cultural context, ethical issues,
characteristics for a group leadership, skills in group leader, formation of
a group. Transactional analysis is explained in detail in this Unit. Basic
assumptions, key concepts and goals of transactional analysis are discussed
in detail. The therapeutic procedure, implementation of therapy, therapeutic
operations, and re-decisional approach of the Gouldings are explained in
this Unit. Further, the existential approach to counselling is described with
the key concepts and its application. The Unit also acquaints you with
the eclectic approach to counselling.
Q
UNIT 5 PSYCHODYNAMIC APPROACHES
Structure
5.1 Introduction
5.2 Historical Roots of Psychodynamic Therapy
5.3 What is Psychodynamic Psychotherapy?
5.3.1 Assumptions of Psychodynamic Approaches
5.3.2 Differences between Psychoanalysis and Psychodynamic Psychotherapy
5.4 Processes in Psychodynamic Psychotherapy
5.4.1 Indications and Contraindications for Psychodynamic Psychotherapy
5.4.2 Phases of Psychodynamic Psychotherapy
5.5 The Development of Short-Term Psychodynamic Psychotherapy
5.5.1 Types of Short-Term Psychodynamic Psychotherapy
5.5.2 Differences between Long-Term PsychodynamicPsychotherapy and ShortTerm Psychodynamic Psychotherapy
5.6 Efficacy and Effectiveness of Psychodynamic Psychotherapy
5.7 Let Us Sum Up
5.8 Glossary
5.9 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
5.10 Unit End Questions
5.11 Further Readings and References
5.1 INTRODUCTION
Psychodynamic psychotherapy is a method of verbal communication used to help a
person find relieffrom emotional pain.Any therapy involving the gradual exploration
of conflicts not previously accessible to the conscious mind can be considered a
dynamic psychotherapy. Psychodynamic treatments and approachesassume that
each of us has an inner life that is important in understanding our outer life, and that
both are the product of our personal histories.
The theoreticalbasisfor dynamic therapiesis 'neurotic conflicts' ,that are unconscious
conflicts resulting in anxiety and, can lead to psychopathology. The individual's
previous experiences and relationships that are relevant to these conflicts and the
powerful associated emotions will emerge during therapy. Awareness of these
unconscious conflicts, as well as associated desires and symbolic meanings, can;
bring understanding of the emotional state of a patient, as well as relief from
symptoms. Psychodynamic psychotherapy has similarities with detective work. It'
seeks out motives and tries to read between the lines of human behaviour, focusing
on what the patients do not know and do not want to know. It looks for repetitivepatterns of behaviour; uses present relationships to shed light on the past and pays
attention to the irrational things and unspoken words. The Unit focuses on
psychodynamic approaches to therapeutic interventions.
/
'')
i
I
Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
8
Objectives
After studying this Unit, you will be able to:
• Describe the major psychoanalytic schools that have influenced the
development of psychodynamic approaches;
• Define the primary assumptions of psychodynamic psychotherapy and explain
how it differsfrom psychoanalysis;
• Illustrate the indications and contraindications for psychodynamic
psychotherapy;
• Elaborate on the therapeutic processes and techniques during the initial, middle
and termination stages of psychodynamic psychotherapy;
• Trace the historical development of models of short-term psychodynamic
therapy;
• Describe the differences between short-term and long-term psychodynamic
approaches; and
• Summarise the research evidence on the effectiveness of psychodynamic
psychotherapy.
5.2 mSTORICAL ROOTS OF PSYCHODYNAMIC
THERAPY
The theory supporting psychodynamic therapy originated in and is informed by
psychoanalytic theory. There are four major schools of psychoanalytic theory,
each of which has influenced psychodynamic therapy. The four schools are
Freudian psychology, ego psychology, object relations psychology and self
psychology.
1. Freudian Psychology
Freudian psychology is based on the theories first formulated by Sigmund Freud in
the early part of twentieth century and is sometimes referred to as the drive or
structural model. The essence ofFreud'stheory isthatsexual and aggressive energies
originating in the id (or unconscious) are modulated by the ego, which is a set of ,
functions that moderates between the id that seeks immediate gratification of these
instinctual drives and the superego which represents the moral and ethical demands '
of external social reality. Defense mechanisms are coristructions of the ego that
unconsciously operate to protect against conscious awareness of anxiety-provoking
memories, wishes, fears or needs. The major defense mechanism is repression, -
which induces "forgetting" of harsh realities.The psychoanalytical model also states
that many of the unconscious conflicts develop in early childhood and may account
for strong feelings, conflicts and symptoms later in life. This psychosexual theory
postulated the oral, anal, phallic, latency and genital stages of development.
Psychoanalysis emphasises the concept ofpsychic determinism, which states that
people behave in specific ways for specific reasons, even if these remain out of
conSCIOUSawareness.
/
2. Ego Psychology
Ego psychology derives from Freudian psychology and its proponents include Heinz
Hartrnann, Anna Freud, Erik Erikson, Paul Gray and Fred Busch. Ego psychology
broadened the scope of psychoanalytic concerns, from psychopathology to general
human development and an increased focus on normal and pathological ego functions
and adaptation to the demands of reality. Ego psychology stresses the individual's
capacity for defense adaptation and reality testing.
3. Object Relations Psychology
Object relations psychology was first articulated by several British analysts like
Melanie Klein, W.R.D. Fairbaim, D.W. Winnicott and Harry Guntrip. According to
this theory, human beings are always shaped in relation to the significant others
surrounding them. Our struggles and goals in life focus on maintaining relations with
others, while at the same time differentiating ourselves from others. The internal
representations of self and others acquired in childhood are later played out in adult
relations. Individuals repeatold object relationships in an effort to master them and
become freed from them ..
4. Self Psychology
Self psychology was founded by Heinz Kohut, in Chicago during the 1950s. Kohut
observed that the self refers to a person's perception of her or his experience of self,
includirig the presence or lack of a sense of self-esteem. The self is perceived in
relation to the establishment of boundaries and the differentiations of self from others
(or the lack of boundaries and differentiations). Disturbances in "self-object"
internalisations from parents are associated with later difficulties.
Although these theoretical schools differ in many ways, they are united by the emphasis
on unconscious elements and their influence on mental health. These psychoanalytical
theories have formed the basic elements of contemporary psychodynamic
psychotherapy.
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Name the four main schools of psychoanalytic thought and their proponents,
which have influenced the development of psychodynamic therapy.
5.3 WHAT IS PSYCHODYNAMIC
PSYCHOTHERAPY?
Psychodynamic approaches are characterised by certain underlying assumptions
and intervention methods. These set psychodynamic approaches apart from other
therapeutic modalities.
Psychodynamic Approaches
9

Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
10
5.3.1 Assumptions of Psychodynamic Approaches
Psychodynamic approaches are based on certain assumptions; ~hese are as follows:
i
1) what people say and do has meaning, although it may be outside of conscious
awareness;
2) there are patterns to one's behaviour;
3) these repetitive patterns can be discerned from the individual's life narrative,
and observed in the therapeutic relationship; and
4) although these behaviours become fixed, they can change with insight and
understanding.
Psychodynamic psychotherapy utilises seven types of interventions or techniques
that differentiate it from other types of therapy (Blagys and Hilsenroth, 2000). These
are given below:
1) A focus on affect and expression of the patient's emotions;
2) Exploration of the patient's attempts to avoid topics or engage in activities that
hinder the progress of therapy (avoidance, resistance);
3) '\ Identification of patterns in the patient's actions, thoughts, feelings, experiences,
and relationships;
4) An emphasis on past relationships;
5) A focus on interpersonal experiences;
6) An emphasis on the therapeutic relationship; and
7) An exploration of wishes, fantasies and dreams.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this
Unit
l. Mark 'True' or 'False':
i) Psychodynamic psychotherapy focuses on thoughts,
feelings and behaviours that have unconscious roots. TruelFalse
ii) Psychodynamic psychotherapy avoids exploration of
past childhood experiences and relationships. TruelFalse
iii) Identification of negative automatic thoughts is
the hallmark of psychodynamic psychotherapy. TruelFalse
iv) One of the primary goals of psychodynamic
psychotherapy is insight. TrueIFalse
/
Differences between Psychoanalysis and
Psychodynamic Psychotherapy
Psychodynamic psychotherapy has derived from psychoanalysis and has many
similarities with psychoanalysis. It may be useful to conceptualise the two that is
psychoanalysis and psychodynamic psychotherapy as lying on a therapeutic
continuum without many rigid differences: The differences between the two are given
asbelows:
5.3.2
• The frequency of sessions in psychodynamic psychotherapy is lower (1 to 3
sessions per week) than in psychoanalysis (4 to 5 sessions per week).
• The use of the couch for patient to lie on during sessions, with the patient out
of the therapist's visual range, is characteristic of psychoanalysis whereas patient
and therapist sit face to face in psychodynamic psychotherapy.
• The goals of therapy tend to be more modest in psychodynamic psychotherapy,
when compared with psychoanalysis. This may include symptom relief, only
partial personality reorganisation and partial reconstruction of the past. The
aim is a more select and focused understanding of problems and some conflict
areas may be intentionally overlooked.
• Psychodynamic psychotherapy focuses more on current dynamic conflicts and
problems than on past issues.
• There are some differences related to the therapeutic relationship. The
adherence to therapeutic neutrality is less rigid in psychodynamic psychotherapy
than in psychoanalysis. Neutrality means that the analyst does not take sides
in the patient's conflicts, express feelings about the patient, or talk about her or
his own life. Therapist neutrality is intended to help the patient stay focused on
issues rather than be concerned with the therapist's reactions. Psychodynamic
psychotherapy also acknowledges the real personality and attitudes of the
therapist. There is often more therapist activity in psychodynamic psychotherapy.
• Although psychodynamic psychotherapy stresses the importance of
transference within the treatment relationship, it does not promote the depth
and intensity of the transference to the same extent as in psychoanalysis.
Transference refers to patients' repetition of thoughts and feelings connected
with siblings, parents or other past figures, in the relationship w.ith therapist.
Psychodynamic psychotherapy places greater emphasis on the 'here and now'
in terms of the patient's interpersonal relationships and experiences outside of
the therapy. Positive transference may not be explored, unless it interferes with
progress in therapy. In psychoanalysis, there is much greater emphasis on the
experiences within the analysis and the relationship between the therapist and
patient. The transference neurosis may be fostered and then analysed.
• In terms of techniques, psychodynamic psychotherapy may integrate certain
supportive and more directive techniques apart from the techniques like free
association, clarification and interpretation derived from psychoanalysis. These
include reassuring and affirming the patient and giving of relevant advice, along
with emphasis on more here-and-now and partial interpretation. Free
association, where the patient talks about whatever comes into mind, without
censoring or editing the flow of ideas or memories, is used extensively in
psychoanalysis. Free association allows the patient to return to earlier or more
childlike emotional states ("regress").
/
Psychodynamic Approaches
11

Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
12
• While psychodynamic psychotherapy may not always vary in length from
psychoanalysis, there are short-term variants of psychodynamic psychotherapy,
upto about 20 sessions, which address focal conflicts. Psychoanalysis is by
definition, a long-term treatment lasting from three to five years or more.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
~I
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Fill in the blanks:
i) Therapeutic neutrality is strictly adhered to in _
ii) has a relatively greater focus on current conflicts
than on past dynamic issues and problems.
iii) The use of the couch is characteristic of sessions in _
iv) _______ emphasises partial interpretation of unconscious
conflicts.
v) The frequency of therapy sessions ranges from one to three sessions
per week in. _
5.4 'PROCESSES IN PSYCHODYNAMIC
PSYCHOTHERAPY
Psychodynamic psychotherapy might not be the treatment of choice for all patients.
In this Section, we look at the important indications and contraindications for
psychodynamic psychotherapy. The phases of psychodynamic psychotherapy are
described with their distinct foci and, goals, therapeutic techniques and therapeutic
processes.
5.4.1 Indications and Contraindications for Psychodynamic
Psychotherapy
•
There are a number of factors that guide the selection of patients for psychodynamic
psychotherapy. These include:
• Psychological-mindedness : Psychological-mindedness refers to the
capacity for insight and to understand problems in psychological terms. Patients
with this capacity can think abstractly and symbolically about meanings of
behaviour and tend to look inwards for explanations of things that happen to
them, rather than externalising responsibility.
• Motivation for insight and change: Psychodynamic psychotherapy requires
adequate motivation for introspection and change.
• Average to above average intelligence.
• Verbal capacity: Patients need to have a well-developed ability to verbalise
internal experiences.
/
• Adequate ego strength: Adequate ego strength includes the ability to sustain
feelings and fantasies without impulsively acting upon them, being overwhelmed
by anxiety, or losing the capacity to continue the dialogue. The individual with
good ego strength is better able to maintain a therapeutic alliance.
• Relatively mature superego development: Patients who commit criminal
acts or have inadequate superego development are rarely suitable.
• Ability to tolerate change and a degree of frustration, sadness and other
painful emotion.
• The capacity to distinguish between reality and fantasy.
• Ability to form and sustain relationships: The capacity to relate well enough
to form an effective working relationship with the analyst. Where there is inability
to enter into trusting relationships (for example, in paranoid personality disorder),
or where there is significant inability to maintain relationship boundaries (for
example, in borderline personality disorder), psychodynamic psychotherapy is
not indicated.
People considered best suited to psychodynamic psychotherapy include those with
depression, certain personality disorders, anxiety, sexual difficulties, neurotic conflicts
and chronic relationship problems. Common problems including difficulties with
intimacy, lack of assertiveness, self-defeating behaviour and problems with authority,
unresolved grief or problems related to separation or rejection are aslo treated through
this form of psychotherapy.
Assessment of suitability for psychodynamic psychotherapy should also include some
extemallife situations. Patients in midst of major life crisis, for example, loss of job
or divorce, serious physical illness or inadequate financial resources may not be
suitable for initiating psychodynamic psychotherapy.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Mark 'True' or 'False'
The following patient characteristics are considered as indications for patient
selection is psychodynamic psychotherapy:
i) Good verbal capacity TruelFalse
it) Use of mature defence mechanisms True!False
iii) Psychological-mindedness TnielFalse
iv) Adequate ego strength TruelFalse
5.4.2 Phases of Psychodynamic Psychotherapy
Sessions of psychodynamic psychotherapy may be scheduled from one to three
days per week, with greater frequency allowing for more in-depth treatment. The
duration of individual sessions varies, but typically lasts for 45 to 50 minutes. The
length of treatment may vary from several sessions to months or years.
/
Psychodynamic Approaches
13

Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
14
Initiation Phase
Psychodynamic psychotherapy begins with a period of evaluation in the initial sessions,
with a focus on three major tasks. This phase of interviewing and learning may take
place in one session or over a series of sessions.
Firstly, the patient's strengths, emotional problems and reasons for seeking treatment
are discussed. This process gives the therapist the opportunity to learn about the
person, to develop an understanding of her or his troubles, and to formulate ideas
about how treatment should proceed. What the therapist focuses on is how the
patient reveals herself or himself, patterns of relating to others, feelings and sources
of anxiety, initial defenses and resistances to treatment and situations that influence
behaviour. Early transferential responses by the patient are also noted and stored
for future use in the treatment when a better understanding of the patient's past
experiences will shed light on the present response.
An important component of the psychodynamic approach is the psychodynamic
formulation. This is a statement of the patient's central issues and conflicts. It attempts
to explain their role in the present situation and predict how they will affect treatment
and the therapeutic relationship. The psychodynamic formulation begins by addressing
the question of "Why this particular patient presents with this diagnosis and
these particular problems at this particular time ?" (Perry, Cooper & Michels,
1987). The psychodynamic formulation serves as a kind of blueprint or game plan,
and can be modified over time as one gets additional information and circumstances
change. When the patient's behaviour in therapy is seen as a manifestation of their
individual dynamics, and as characteristic problems can be predicted and understood,
the therapist can be more objective, non-judgemental and empathic.
Secondly, this phase involves "getting to know the patient" and forming a sense of
trust and safety in the therapeutic relationship.
Thirdly, factors as the frequency and length of sessions, responsibilities of both patient
and therapist and the policy for payment are also discussed.
The Middle Phase
The middle phase is devoted to exploring, analysing, working through, and resolving
patients' intrapsychic, interpersonal problems and interpreting defenses. In this stage,
the transference responses and the resistance to treatment, which only began budding
earlier, become more pronounced and become a vital part of the treatment itself.
Each individual patient brings her or his own history, problems and ways of relating
which makes the practice of doing psychodynamic psychotherapy an art as well as
a SCIence.
The term resistance is one that is ubiquitous in psychodynamic psychotherapy. It
means that the patient is avoiding full awareness of unconscious drives, conflict and
fantasies. First, resistance is unconscious, the patient does not know what she or he
is avoiding and uses all kind of defenses to avoid that realisation. Second, resistance ~reflects a search for gratification of a forbidden wish. Third, it also speaks of the fear
of change that we all experience in many situations; to try a new pattern of relating is
scary. But in order to develop and mature, these resistances need of be explored
and understood before new patterns can be tried, a new self-awareness achieved, .
realities accepted and age-appropriate needs satisfied.
/
Table 5.1: Some common defense mechanisms
Defence mechanism Definition
Repression Relegation of threatening wishes, needs or impulses
into unawareness.
Projection Attribution of conflicted thoughts or feelings to another
person/so .
Denial Refusal to accept information about oneself or others.
Regression A partial return to childlike levels of adaptation to
avoid conflict.
Splitting Experiencing others as all good or all bad.
Reaction formation Transformation of an unwanted thought or feeling into
it's opposite.
Isolation Divorcing a feeling from it's unpleasant idea.
Rationalisation Using seemingly logical explanations to make
untenable feelings or thoughts more acceptable.
Displacement Redirection of unpleasant feelings or thoughts onto
another person.
Dissociation Splitting off of thought or feeling from its original
source.
Conversion Transformation of unacceptable wishes or thoughts
into bodily sensation.
Sublimation A mature mechanism whereby unacceptable thoughts
and feelings are channelled into socially acceptable
ones.
One of the major resistances used by any patient is that of transference.Transference,
in which the individual relates to the therapist based on past experiences with parents
or significant others, and the here-and-now collaboration between therapist and
patient, together make up the therapeutic alliance. This constitutes 9ne of the most
effective tools towards change. The therapist attempts to create a safe environment
by being consistent, non-judgemental and supportive.
Countertransference is the phenomenon in which the therapist is affected by and
responds to the patient in some unconscious way. This is often viewed as a reaction
to the patient's transference. For example, the therapist 'forgets' the appointment
of an emotionally demanding patient or the therapist prolongs the treatment sessions
of a patient who expresses feeling 'unloved' by her or his mother. Initially, counter
transference was considered to be an impediment to psychotherapy but it is now
considered to be a potentially very helpful phenomenon in understanding the patient.
Therapists need to be self-reflective and recognise countertransference early.
Confrontation highlights aspects of behaviour and feelings that the patient is trying
to minimise or avoid. For example, the therapist might say, in a gentle and sensitive
manner, "I am not sure if you have noticed, but whenever I ask you to tell me more
about your mother, you change the subject".
/
Psychodynamic Approaches
15
I
Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
16
Clarification is another important intervention wherein the therapist attempts to
summarise various things expressed by the patient and even help the patient articulate
what they might have difficulty putting in words.
Interpretations may involve explanatory statements that link behaviours, thoughts,
fantasies, feelings or symptoms to their unconscious meanings or origins. For example,
the therapeutic interpretation might state, "It may be that you cannot confront your
colleague at work because he reminds you about your father".
Interpretation of the transference is carried out by linking the experiences in the
therapeutic relationship to current or past relationships. These unconscious drives,
defenses, attitudes or feelings could be a wish for satisfaction (for example, to depend
on someone or to idealise someone or to be taken care of), or need for punishment,
or sexual or aggressive fantasies. The therapist becomes the person that the patient
struggled with in her or his childhood. These struggles are played out again in the.
present, but this time with the therapist's help to look at the conflicts. With insight
into the way she or he misreads or misperceives other people in the present, new
patterns of behaviour and experience could result.
Working through occupies most of the work in psychoanalytic treatment after the
transference has been formed and the patient has begun to acquire insights into her
or his problems. Working through is a process in which the new awareness is
repeatedly tested and "tried on for size" in other areas of the patient's life. It allows
the patient to understand the influence of the past on her or his present situation, to
accept it emotionally as well as intellectually, and to use the new understanding to
make changes in present life. Working through thus helps the patient to gain some
measure of control over inner conflicts and to resolve them or minimize their power.
This leads the patient to experience wider choices in life, since past distortions no
longer cloud present decision making.
The Termination Phase
The final part of the treatment phase is the period in which changes are consolidated
and new behaviours are solidified. Old patterns are understood in the context of
one's past and old memories are available where previously they have been repressed.
Conflicts resulting in maladaptive behaviour in the outside world, which were relived
in the therapeutic situation with the therapist, are resolved. Treatment continues until
the troubling symptoms have been reduced or alleviated and the person is consistently
• making use of more adaptive methods of coping with greater insight.
A major issue at the time of termination is to be able to explore issues related to
separation, loss and change for both the patient and the therapist. It is an extremely
important phase for the patient because it helps the patient review the experience,
both emotionally and intellectually, and to be able to separate from a parent-like
figure. The therapist also needs to become aware of possible countertransference
responses of anger, thoughts about breaking boundaries or failure to terminate when
indicated. The length of time allotted to the termination phase varies with the type of
treatment and with the needs of the individual.
After this point, the sessions will become less like an interview; the person is asked
to say whatever is on her or his mind. It is the therapist's job to listen and to help
identify patterns of thinking, feeling and interacting that may be contributing to the
patient's current struggles. Consequently, the person becomes more aware of her or
his thoughts and feelings; learns how some present ways of coping are no longer
adaptive even though they may have been necessary in childhood; and discovers
/
that she or he as an adult has a greatly expanded repertoire of resources and can use
far more effective ways of dealing with problems. Deeper awareness and new insights
stimulate psychological growth and change.
Psychodynamic psychotherapy places great importance on the therapeutic dyad,
which is a medical term for the relationship between the therapist and the patient. It
is within the context ofthe therapeutic dyad that positive changes in the patient's
outlook and behaviours are able to unfold. This relationship is unique because the
therapist maintains a uniform, neutral and accepting stance. Unlike other wellintentioned people in the person's life, the therapist has been trained to listen objectively
and without criticism. This therapeutic attitude makes it easier for the person seeking
treatment to speak freely and to therefore provide as much information for the therapist
to work with as is possible.
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Choose the correct answer:
i) In psychodynamic psychotherapy, the analysis of is the
process by ~hich the therapist interprets the feelings expressed by
the client toward the therapist as being indicative of the feelings
typically expressed by the client toward important people in her or
his personal life,
a) free association b) resistances c) dreams d) transference
ii) The tentative statement of the patients' individual dynamics and conflicts
is called _
a) psychodynamic formulation b) clarification c) insight d) reaction
formation
iii) All of the following are components of psychodynamic therapy except
for:
a) interpretation b) working through c) socratic questioning d)
clarification
iv) Issues related to separation, loss and change are prominent in the
________ stage of psychodynamic psychotherapy.
a) middle b) termination c) initial d) follow-up
v) In psychodynamic psychotherapy, is the
process by which new in sights are acquired and these are used to
make changes in current life situations and functioning.
a) analysis of defences b) analysis of transference c)working through
d) interpretation
vi) The defense mechanism in which an unacceptable thought or feeling is
transformed into it's opposite is:
a) displacement b) sublimation c) reaction formation d) denial
/
Psychodynamic Approaches
17

Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
18
5.5 THE DEVELOPMENT OF SHORT-TERM
PSYCHODYNAMIC PSYCHOTHERAPY
Current trends highlight the evolution of short-term dynamic therapies. The healing
and change process envisioned in long-term psychodynamic therapy typically requires
at least two years of sessions. This is because the goal of therapy is often to change
an aspect of one's identity or personality or to integrate key developmental learning
missed while the client was stuck at an earlier stage of emotional development.
Practitioners of brief psychodynamic therapy believe that some changes can happen
through a more rapid process or that an initial short intervention will start an ongoing
process of change that does not need the constant involvement of the therapist. A
central concept in brief therapy is that there should be one major focus for the
therapy rather than the more traditional psychoanalytic practice of allowing the client
to associate freely and discuss unconnected issues. In brief therapy, the central focus
is developed during the initial evaluation process, occurring during the first session
or two. This focus must be agreed on by the client and therapist. The central focus
singles out the most important issues and thus creates a structure and identifies a
goal for the treatment. In brief therapy, the therapist is expected to be fairly active in
keeping the session focused on the main issue. Having a clear focus makes it possible
to do interpretive work in a relatively short time because the therapist only addresses
the circumscribed problem area.
5.5.1 Types of Short-Term Psychodynamic Psychotherapy
Major influences on the development of short-term psychodynamic approaches
include Ferenczi, Rank, Reich and Alexander. Franz Alexander challenged the
psychoanalytic emphasis on frequent, long-term treatment that could foster
dependency. He emphasised the need to identify a "focal conflict", need for an
adequate dynamic formulation and the central role of the "corrective emotional
experience". Alexander and Ircnch (1946) asserted that the principal curative power
of treatment occurs as the patient gains the emotional perception that she or he is no
longer a child and no longer subject to the unconscious behaviour patterns put in
place at that time. Alexander offers the example of a patient's early expressions of
aggression having been intimidated by a father who required complete submissiveness
from his son. As a result the patienrhas become inhibited in all situations in which she
or he faces a person of authority. Thepatient makes that shift when she or he can
express her or his aggressiveness and her or his vulnerability with the therapist without
being punished, and can assert herself or himself without being censured. This type
of corrective emotional experience allows an individual to experience a difference
between the way things were in the past and the present emotional experience.
As one ofthe early pioneers in the field, Malan (1963,1976) introduced the use of
videotaped sessions and scientific research on Focal Psychotherapy. This included
the development of inclusion criteria for patient selection, identification of focal issues,
emphasis on intense affect experienced by the patient, analysis of transference linked
with childhood and the importance of working through "loss" of therapist during
termination.
A parallel development was Mann's 12-session Time-limited Therapy (Mann,
1973), that focused on separation-individuation issues that were stimulated by the
quick, planned termination of therapy. This therapeutic approach elicited four universal
conflicts; which are as follows:
/
1. Independence versus dependence,
2. Activity versus passivity,
3. Adequate self-esteem versus diminished self-esteem, and
4. Unresolved or delayed grief.
Short-term anxiety provoking therapy developed by Sifneos (1973, 1987), selected
patients having conflicts related to the oedipal stage. Techniques provoked anxiety
by early and repeated focus on transference patterns and the interpretation of defenses
and resistance. Potential candidates who met the stringent selection criteria were
limited to those with the less severe neurotic disorders.
Intensive short-term dynamic psychotherapy developed by Davanloo (1979),
even included a single-session treatment. Unlike the earlier models of short term
dynamic psychotherapy, Davanloo's approach could be used with a range of patients
with neurotic disorders along with highly resistant personality disorders. Interestingly,
he used the initial interview as a "trial therapy" to judge patients "potential suitability
and therapy response.
T'vo important concepts included the triangle of conflict (Fig. 9.1b) and the triangle
c. person (Fig 9.1 a). The triangle of conflict is the interplay between defense,
anxiety and impulse-feeling. The triangle of person refers to the transference (T),
current life figures (C), and significant past figures (P). The primary therapeutic
technique is the extensive use of transference. The therapist makes T-C-P links,
clarifying and confronting the defenses against intimacy and closeness which tend to
sabotage relationships. This "unlocking of the unconscious" makes the patient aware
of transference patterns rooted in the past and also involves expression of grief and
guilt feelings over past losses.
Figure 9.1a: Triangle of Person Figure 9.1h: Triangle of Conflict
T P x D
C A
T Transference (relationship to therapist) X Impulse (hidden feelings)
C Current relationship difficulties D Defence
P Relationship with past figures A Anxiety
Contemporary versions of short-term psychodynamic psychotherapy include TimeLimited Psychotherapy (TLP; Strupp & Binder, 1984) and Short-term
Supportive-Expressive Psychoanalytic Psychotherapy (Luborsky, 1984). These
models include training and supervision using treatment manuals and an emphasis on
research of treatment processes and outcomes. .
/Psychodynamic Approaches
19
Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
20
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Match the following:
i) Franz Alexander a) Oedipal conflict
ii) Malan b) Corrective emotional
expenence
iii) Davanloo c) Separation-individuation
conflicts
iv) Mann d) Triangle of person
v) Sifneos e) Focal psychotherapy
5.5.2 Differences between Long-term Psychodynamic
Psychotherapy and Short-term Psychodynamic
Psychotherapy
It is useful to distinguish more classical or traditional psychodynamic
psychotherapy from short-term psychodynamic psychotherapy.
The open-ended and long-term intervention has certain defining characteristics.
The sessions are usually 1 to 3 times a week and could extend over a few
years. The therapist is less directive, allowing the patient to bring up whatever
seems important or meaningful to them. In fact, the underlying issues or reasons
for seeking treatment may not become apparent until well into therapy. The
focus is more on the whole person and their character, defenses and values,
etc. The presenting complaint or initial diagnosis receives relatively less attention.
Transferences are analysed as' the relationship between patient and therapist
goes through a number of changes and permutations. Therapy goals include
insight and personality reorganisation.
Short-term psychodynamic psychotherapy, on the other hand, is usually timelimited, consisting of 16 to 30 sessions, conducted on once or twice-weekly
basis. The therapist is relatively active, and fosters the development of a
therapeutic alliance and positive transference. There is focus on specific conflicts
or themes that are formulated early in therapy. The psychodynamic formulation
is conceptualised most simply in terms of a formative or critical life event
and the coping skills or defenses used to deal with it or as a pattern of
relationship conflicts. Attention is paid to the setting of achievable goals,
adhering to the tasks at hand, and on issues involving termination. The use
of manual-based treatments and systematic research is more common in shortterm psychodynamic psychotherapy.
/
Check Your Progress Exercise 7
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this
Unit.
1. Briefly describe the differences between short-term and long-term
psychodynamic psychotherapy in terms. of frequency and duration of
therapy, herapeutic goals and the levels of therapist directiveness.
5.6 EFFICACY AND EFFECTIVENESS OF
PSYCHODYNAMIC PSYCHOTHERAPY
There is increasing research evidence suggesting that psychodynamic psychotherapy
is an effective psychological treatment for individuals experiencing mental health
problems.
An initial review (Roth &Fonagy, 1996) concluded that there was a lack of confirming
evidence for short-term psychodynamic psychotherapy. More recently positive
outcomes have been reported for short-term psychodynamic psychotherapy,
equivalent to already established treatments (for example, cognitive-behavioural
therapy) in specific psychiatric disorders (Leichsenring & Leibing, 2007). Notably,
the effects proved stable and even tended to increase with follow-up. Emerging
data supports its role as a treatment for depression, generalised anxiety disorder,
panic disorder and some personality disorders. There remains limited evidence for
the use of this treatment for patients with anxiety disorders that relate more to stress.
Limited and inconclusive evidence currently exists to support short -term supportive
psychotherapy as a treatment for bipolar disorder, eating disorders and drug
dependency (Lewis, Dennerstein & Gibbs, 2008).
As one might expect, there are few studies of the effectiveness of long-term
psychodynamic psychotherapy. The Stockholm Outcome of Psychotherapy and
Psychoanalysis Project (STOPP) followed up patients over a three year period
while the German Psychoanalytic Association Study looked at therapy changes seven
years post treatment. Both studies pointed to the value of intensive long-term treatment.
There is little research that guides us regarding a choice between long-term and
short -term psychodynamic approaches. A recent study (Knekt et al. 2008) reported
that short-term therapies produced benefits more quickly than long-term
psychodynamic psychotherapy but long-term psychodynamic psychotherapy is
superior to short-term therapies at the end of three years.
Some clinicians criticise dynamic therapies because they have arisen primarily from
theory and clinical observations instead of evidence-based research studies. Further,
research is needed on specific psychiatric disorders, effectiveness of different models
of psychodynamic psychotherapy, usefulness of therapy manual and differences
Psychodynamic Approaches

Schools of Counselling and
Psych~therapy
22
related to therapist factors. Evaluation of therapeutic progress must go beyond
symptom reduction and should include important changes in personality organisation
and structure like decreased vulnerability to stress, improved coping strategies and
defenses.
5.7 LET US SUM UP
In this Umt, we have learnt about psychodynamic approaches in therapeutic
intervention. The Unit focused on tracing the historical contributors to the development
of psychodynamic approaches., The Unit outlined the basic assumptions of
psychodynamic psychotherapy. We have learnt the differences between
psychodynamic psychotherapy and psychoanalysis. Further, the Unit listed the
indications and contraindications for psychodynamic psychotherapy. The Unit also
described the therapeutic processes and techniques in the initial, middle and
termination phases of psychodynamic psychotherapy. The Unit described the different
models of short-term psychodynamic approaches. It clarified the differences between
short-term and long-term psychodynamic approaches. In the end, the Unit
summarised the research evidence on the effectiveness of psychodynamic approaches.
5.8 GLOSSARY
Clarification ! Clarification is the technique by which the therapist
elucidates and separates details of a phenomenon
from other thoughts that the patient is having. For
example: "You have mentioned feeling anxious in
sessions recently, but it now seems clear that this
started right after you mentioned to me that you
were having difficulty with your wife".
Confrontation Confrontation is the process of drawing the patient's
attention to a particular phenomenon and getting
him to recognise something thaihe has been avoiding
and that will have to be further understood. For
example: "I notice that each time your boss praises
your work, you become disinterested in yourjob
and think about quitting".
Countertransference The therapist's feelings, attitudes and reactions to
the patient's transference.
Defense mechanisms Unconscious mental operations that operate to
protect against conscious awareness of anxietyprovoking memories, wishes, fears or needs.
Free association Technique in which the patient verbalises her or his
thoughts and feeling without reservation or
censorship, even though such thoughts may be
embarrassing, sexual, humiliating, and/or aggressive,
and even though such thoughts may be about the
therapist. Free association is extremely useful for
elucidating unconscious processes.
/ I
Interpretation Interpretation refers to the therapist making
connections between the patient's current behaviour
(including thoughts, feelings,fantasies and dreams)
and the patient's past history (including childhood
experiences, wishes and fears) to highlight its
unconscious meanings. For example: "Despite your
wish to remain close to your husband, you are
pushing him away just as you felt that your mother
pushed you away".
Regression An unconscious defensive process by which the
patient reverts to a previous level of functioning,
usually to a certain infantile orjuvenile stage.
Resistance All forces which oppose the treatment in an attempt
to defend the status quo ofthe patient's neurosis.
Resistance is usually motivated by anxiety and the
unconscious avoidance of painful affects, ideas,
wishes and fears.
Transference The experience of feelings, thoughts, attitudes,
fantasies and defences toward a person in the
present that are inappropriate to that person and
are a repetition or a displacement of reactions
originating towards significant persons of early
childhood (for example, parents).Transferencemay
be positive or negative.
Working through Working through refers to the complex and
extended process of gradual change reflecting the
effortsofinsight and practisingand recognising new
behaviours.
5.9 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1. . Following are the four main schools of psychoanalytic thought and their
proponents, which have influenced the development of psychodynamic therapy:
i) Freudian psychology by Sigmund Freud;
ii) Ego psychology by Heinz Hartmann, Anna Freud, Erik Eiikson, Paul
Gray and Fred Busch;
iii) Object relations psychology by Melanie K1ein,W.R.D. Fairbairn, D.W.
Wmnicott, and Harry Guntrip; and
iv) Self psychology by Heinz Kohut.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
1. i) True
ii) False
/
PsycbodynamicApproacbes
23
Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
24
iii) False
iv) True
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1. i) psychoanalysis
ii) Psychodynamic psychotherapy
iii) psychoanalysis
iv) Psychodynamic psychotherapy
v) psychodynamic psychotherapy
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
1. i) True
ii) False
iii) True
iv) True
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
1.
i) d) transference
it) a) psychodynamic formulation
iii) c) socratic questioning
iv) b) termination
v) c) working through
vi) c) reaction formation
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
1.
i)-b, ii)-e, iiij-d, iv)-c, v)-a
Check Your Progress Exercise 7
•
Following are the differences between short-term and long-term psychodynamic
psychotherapy:
1) Frequency and duration of therapy: Short-term psychodynamic psychotherapy
is usually time-limited, consisting of 16 to 30 sessions, conducted on once or
twice-weekly basis. In long-term psychodynamic psychotherapy, sessions are .
usually 1 to 3 times a week and could extend over a few years.
Therapeutic goals: In long-term psychodynamic psychotherapy, the therapy
goals include insight and personality reorganisation. In short-term psychodynamic
approaches, the goals are more limited, focusing on specific conflicts and what
might be achievable in the time available.
Levels of therapist directiveness: The therapist level of directiveness is relatively
higher in short-term psychodynamic psychotherapy than in long-term
psychodynamic psychotherapy.
/
. ,
5.10 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. Discuss the differences between psychoanalysis and psychodynamic
psychotherapy.
2. Enumerate the indications and contraindications for patient selection in
psychodynamic psychotherapy ..
3. What are defense mechanisms? Describe some important defense mechanisms
and their significance in psychodynamic psychotherapy.
4. Describe the therapeutic techniques used predominantly in the middle phase of
psychodynamic psychotherapy.
5. What is the importance of the termination phase iri psychodynamic
psychotherapy?
6. Briefly discuss the .important models of short-term psychodynamic
psychotherapy.
5.11 FURTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES
Blagys, M.D. Hilsenroth, MJ. (2000). Distinctive features of short-term
psychodynamic-interpersonal psychotherapy: A review of the comparative
psychotherapy literature. Clinical Psychology Science andPractice, 7(2), 167'-
88.
Fonagy, P., Roth, A, & Higgitt, A (2005). Psychodynamic psychotherapies:
Evidence-based practice and clinical wisdom. Bulletin of the Menninger Clinic,
69(1), 1-58~
Gabbard, G.O. (2000). Psychodynamic Psychiatry in Clinical Practice, Third
Edition. Washington, DC: American Psychiatric Press, Inc.
Leichsenring, F.& Leibing, E. (2007). Psychodynamic psychotherapy: Asystematic
review of techniques, indications and empirical evidence. Psychology and
Psychotherapy: Theory, Research and Practice, 80 (2), 217-228.
Lewis, AJ., Dennerstein, M., & Gibbs, P.M. (2008). Short-term psychodynamic
psychotherapy: Review of recent process and outcome studies. Australian and
New Zealand Journal of Psychiatry, 42 (6),445 - 455.
Leichsenring, F., Rabung, S., & Leibing, E. (2004). The efficacy of short-term
psychodynamic psychotherapy in specific psychiatric disorders: Arneta-analysis.
Archives of General Psychiatry, 61(12), 1208-1216.
Magnavita, J.J. (1993). The evolution of short-term dynamic psychotherapy:
Treatment of the future. Professional Psychology: Research and Practice, 24,
360-365.
Perry, S., Cooper, AM., & Michels, R. (1987). The psychodynamic formulation:
Its purpose, structure, and clinical application. American Journal of Psychiatry,
144(5), 543-550. \
/
PsycbodynamicApproacbes
25
t,.
UNIT 6 COGNITIVE. BEHAVIOURAL,
,-
APPROACHES
- 'Structure -
<6.1 Introduction
6.2 Historyof Cognitive Behavioural Therapy
6.3- Concept of Cognitive Behavioural Therapy
63.1 Rational Emotive Behaviour Therapy by Ellis
632 Application to Family Therapy
6.4 .Cognitive Therapy by Aaron Beck
6.4.1 Basic Principles of Cognitive Therapy
6.42 Genesis of the Problem
6.43 \ Homework!Assignment
'0.4.4 The Importance of Structure
6.5 Donald Meichenbaum's Cognitive Behaviour Modification
6.6 Therapist's Functions ~d Role
- fJ.9 Differences and Similarities Between REBT, CT and CBM
6.8 What Types of Problems can be Addressed by this Approach?
6.9 Critique of Cognitive Behavioural Therapy
6.9.1 Merits of Cognitive Behavioural Therapy
6.9.2 Limitations of Cognitive Behavioural Therapy
6.93 How Does CBT Work in Learning Coping Skills?
-6.-H) Case illustration of A-B-C-D-EAnalysis
)
6.11 Let Us Sum Up
6.12 Glossary
6.13 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
6.14 Unit End Questions
6.15 Further Readings and References
6.1 INTRODUCTION
"
20
This Unit focuses on cognitive behavioural therapy (CBT). Cognitive behavioural
therapy (CBT) describes a number of therapies with similar approach to solve
,problems. Cognitive behavioural therapy was originated by clinical psychologists
who originally worked as psychoanalysts. In this Unit, you willleam about the .
historical background of cognitive behavioural therapy, and the concept of .
.cognitive behavioural therapy? After going tlirough this Unit you able to answers
'. .:» such questions like: What ar~ the-types of cognitive behavioural therapy?; What
is the process involved in cognitive behavioural therapy?; What types of
problems can be addressed by this approach?; What are the skills required
/
in CBT? The Unit further discusses the merits and limitations of CBT and how
it is different from other therapeutic approaches. You will learn about the nature
of relationship between the client and the counsellor. You will also learn how
this therapy is applied in some. of the case illustrations.
Objectives
After studying this Unit, you will be able to:
• Understand the historical background of CBT;
• Explain the concept of different types of CBT;
• Describe the conditions when CBT can be used; and
• Use CBT when faced with the problems of clients.
'6.2 HISTORY OF COGNITIVE BEHAVIOURAL
THERAPY
Cognitive behavioural approaches include therapies that make use of cognition
in solving of problems, including Rational Emotive Behaviour Therapy (REBT),
Cognitive Therapy (CT), and Cognitive Behavioural Modification (CBM)
propounded by the pioneering experts. In 1955, (REBT) was originated by
Albert Ellis, a New York clinical psychologist who originally worked as a
psychoanalyst. He became dissatisfied with it because he felt it took a long
time and did not produce very effective results. It was preceded by earlier
schools of thought in Greece, especially the Stoic philosopher Epictetus, who
said, in the first century A.D, "People are disturbed not by things, but by the
view which they take of them".
Even Adler writes that our emotional reactions and lifestyle are associated with
our basic beliefs and are, therefore, cognitively created. In the 1960s, Aaron
T. Beck, an American psychiatrist and psychotherapist observed an 'internal
dialogue' going on in the minds of his patients during his analytical sessions.
But they reported only a fraction of this 'internal dialogue' to him. For example,
in a therapy session the client might attribute various reasons for no apparent
intervention by the therapist. Their thoughts lead to certain feelings which in
turn evoked certain behaviour. Beck realised that the link between thoughts
and feelings was very important. He coined the term 'automatic thoughts' to
describe emotion-filled or 'hot' thoughts that might pop up in the mind. According
to Beck, identifying these thoughts was crucial for understanding the client and
overcoming her or his difficulties.
Beck called it cognitive therapy because thinking was considered important. It's
now called Cognitive Behavioural Therapy (CBT) because the therapy employs
. behavioural techniques as well. Since then CBT has undergone scientific trials
in many places by different teams, and has been applied successfully toa wide
variety of problems.
Another major alternative to rational emotive behaviour therapy is Donald
Meichenbaum's cognitive behaviour modification (CBM), which focuses on
changing the client's' self-verbalisations (Meichenbaum, 1977).
/Cognitive Behavioural
Approaches
27

Schools of Counselling
and Psychotherapy
~~o --.'
j
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
.",
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. Fill in the blanks:
i) Cognitive behavioural approaches include therapies that make use of
...................... in solving of problems and ..•..........................
techniques as well.
ii) The pioneers of CBT are , , and
2. State whether 'True' or 'False'
i) Beck gave the concept of Interpersonal dialogue. TIF J
ii) CBT is based on the link between thoughts, feelings and behaviour.
TIF
6.3 CONCEPT OF COGNITIVE BEHAVIOURAL
/
THERAPY
Let us first understand the meaning of the term 'Cognitive behavioural therapy' .
Cognitive behavioural therapy (CBT) is an active type of psychotherapy in which
the client and the counsellor talk, act and work together to achieve goals that are
mutually agreed. In between the sessions assignments are given JO the client that
may include behavioural exercises and/or reading. CBT is a combination of /
psychotherapy and behavioural therapy. Psychotherapy emphasises the importance
of the personal meaning we place on things and how thinking patterns begin in
childhood. Behavioural therapy pa¥s close attention to the relationship between our
problems, our behaviour and our thoughts.
Cognitive behavioural therapy assumes that it is our belief system, interpretations
and perceptions of life events that determine our feelings, moods and our actions.
Therefore, CBT enables people to identify, understand and modify their belief
systems and also their self-defeating behaviours so that they can function more
effectively. Cognitive behavioural therapy (CBT) includes a number of therapies
with similar approach to solving problems. These include:
• Rational Emotive Behaviour Therapy (REBT) by Ellis
• Cognitive Therapy (CT) by Aaron Beck
• Cognitive Behaviour Modification (CBM) by Donald Meichenbaum
The therapies focus on the thoughts, images, beliefs and attitudes that we hold (our
cognitive processes) and also on how these cognitive processes affect the way we
behave. CBT works by changing people's attitudes and their behaviour.
/
6.3.1 Rational Emotive Behaviour Therapy by Ellis
Rational Emotive Behaviour Therapy (REBT) by Ellis is based on the assumption
that we contribute to our own problems and specific symptoms as our emotions
emerge mainly from our beliefs, evaluations, own attitudes, views, perceptions,
interpretations, thoughts about ourselves, and our reactions to life situations, and
the world. It assumes that reorganisation of one's self statements will result
in a corresponding reorganisation of one's behaviour. Inappropriate emotions are
caused by self-defeating thoughts, while appropriate emotions result from rational
thinking. If we learn to alter our beliefs that are not functional, we can improve
our ability to deal with everyday problems, and live more emotionally satisfying
and productive lives.
This approach is based on the assumption that cognition, emotions and
behaviours interact significantly and have a reciprocal cause and effect relationship.
REBT has consistently emphasised all three of these modalities and their
interaction, thus qualifyin~ it as a multimodal and integrative approach.
REBT is a system of psychotherapy, which shows individuals how their belief
systems largely determine how they feel about and act towards events in their
lives. The way we feel depends on the beliefs we hold about the specific event.
This can be understood through an example given below:
Three students in the class are punished by the teacher. One student is
angry because she believes she should not have been punished. On the
contrary she should have been appreciated; the second student is depressed
because she believes that she is worthless; and the third person is happy
because she always found the classes boring and was happy to be out
of them. The important lesson to learn from this story is that although,
the scolding in the class contributes to a series of emotional reactions,
it does not cause them: how each individual perceives being scolded is
the key factor in determining these emotional reactions.
REBT helps people change self-defeating or unhealthy thinking patterns and
behaviours to more positive ones. It is also used to treat many kinds of problems
and/or to improve skills.
REBT helps people achieve specific changes or goals in a brier period of time,
and usually focuses on current situations rather than past ones.
REBT relies heavily on thinking, disputing, debating, challenging, interpreting,
explaining, and teaching. Some of the techniques are explained below:
1. ABC Theory of Personality
The ABC theory of personality is central to ~BT theory and practice. A
is the existence of an event, or the behaviour or attitude of an individual. B
is the belief of the person about A. C is the emotional and behavioural
consequence or reaction of the individual; the reaction can be either healthy
or unhealthy. A (the activating event) does not cause C (the emotional
consequence). Instead, B, which is the person's belief about A, largely causes
C, the emotional reaction.
/
Cognitive Behavioural
Approaches
29

Schools of Counselling
and Psychotherapy
30
A (activating event) B (belief) - C (emotional and behavioural consequence)
D (disputing intervention) - E (eff~ct) - F (new feeling)
If a person experiences depression after a failure, for example, it is not the failure
itself that causes depressive reaction but the person's beliefs about being a failure
and apprehension about ridicule by others. The beliefs about the failure and ridicule
(B) ate what mainly cause the depression (C) - not the actual event of the failure
(at point A). Thus, human beings are largely responsible for creating their own
emotional reactions and disturbances. The therapist shows the clients how they can
change the irrational beliefs that directly "cause" their disturbed emotional
consequences, the client may blame himself such as "I am totally to blame for the
failure", "I am a miserable failure, and everything I did was wrong," "I am a .
worthless person".
After A, Band C comes D (disputing) which is the application of the scientific
method to help clients challenge their irrational beliefs. The principles of logic can
be used to destroy any unrealistic, unverifiable hypothesis. There are three
components of this disputing process; detecting, debating, and discriminating. First,
clientslearn how to detect theirirrationalbeliefs,particularlytheir absolutistic"shoulds"
and "I musts" that are exaggerated beyond proportion. Then clients debate their
dysfunctional beliefs by learning how to logically and scientifically question them and
to vigorously argue themselves out of believing them. Finally, clients learn to
discriminate irrational (self-defeating) beliefs from rational (self-helping) beliefs.
Eventually clients arrive at E, an effective philosophy, which has a practical side. A
new and effective rational philosophy consists of replacing unhealthy thoughts with
healthy ones.
Disputing Irrational Beliefs
REBT usually involves actively disputing the clients' irrational beliefs and teaching
them how to do this challenging on their own. Clients are given practice in challenging
their irrational beliefs like "must", "should", or "ought" until they no longer hold
them, or at least until it is reduced to a great extent, for example, clients may learn
to tell themselves: "Why must everyone treat me respectfully?" "If I don't get what
I want, it may be disappointing, but it is not the end of the world". "If life doesn't
always go the way I would like it (0, it isn't awful, though it may be inconvenient".
Activity 1 : Identify some of your beliefs that have been bothering you. Write
down the dialogue that you visualize for disputing them.
/
Cognitive Homework
The clients can be asked to make lists of their problems, identify their absolute
beliefs, and dispute these beliefs. In homework assignments the clients track down
the absolute beliefs such as "shoulds" and "musts" that reveal their internalized selfmessages. Clients are then asked to apply the A-B-C theory to some of their
problems. Through such exercises and modeling by the therapist, the client learns
how to think differently.
Activity 2: Identify some of your beliefs that have been bothering you. Also
analyze the A, B, C, D, E, and F. How has it changed your thinking, in case
it has.
................................................................ , .
,
Changing One's Language: In REBT inappropriate language is considered one
of the causes of distorted thinking processes, that are beliefs or "musts", "oughis",
and "shoulds", can be replaced by preferences, for example, instead of saying, "It
would be absolutely awful if. .. ", client can learn to say "it would be inconvenient
or uncomfortable if... ". Thus, clients can learn to use milder forms of self-statetnents
instead of self-reprimand or projection of self as helpless.
Activity 3: List some of your beliefs that you would like to change. Do you
think your feeling would change if you change the language? Give-two examples
and your reactions .
..........................................................................!.................. ......
Using Humour: Emotional disturbances occur as we tend to take things too
seriously. In the process, we lose our sense of perspective and humour over the
events of life. Hence, the therapist employs humour to counterattack the over
serious side of individuals and to assist the client in disputing their present philosophy
of life that is causing tension in them.
/
Cognitive Behavioural,
Approaches'
31
, Schools of Counselling
and Psychotherapy
32
,
Activity 4: Think of situations when you were too tense about achieving your
goal. How could you have used human to lessen the tension.
2. Emotive Techniques
These are used in REBT and include unconditional acceptance, rational-emotive
role playing, modeling, rational-emotive imagery, and shame-attacking exercises.
Rational-emotive imagery is a form of intense mental practice for establishing new
emotional patterns. Clientsimagine themselvesthinking,feeling, and behaving exactly
the way they would like to think, feel and behave in real life. They can also practice
imagining one of the worst things that could happen to them, how to feel
inappropriately upset about this situation, how to experience their feelings intensely,
and then how to change the experience to an appropriate feeling. Once clients are
able to change their feelings to appropriate ones, they stand a better chance of
changing their behaviour in the situation. Practising rational-emotive imagery several
times a week for a few weeks can desensitize a client and she or he does not feel
• upset over such events any mote.
Activity 5: Practice imagining one of the worst things that could happen to you.
Do you feel upset about this situation?
Are these feelings in proportion to the situation?
/
How can you experience these feelings intensely?
How can you change the experience to an appropriate feeling?
Role Playing
The therapist often interrupts to show clients what they are telling themselves to
create their disturbances and what they can do to change their inappropriate feelings
to appropriate ones. Clients can rehearse certain behaviours to bring out what they
feel in a situation. The focus is on working through the underlying irrational beliefs
that are related to unpleasant feelings.
Activity 6: Enact a role play session and note down the appropriate and
inappropriate feelings.
.........................................................................................................................
Shame-Attacking Exercises
These can be given to help people reduce shame over behaving in certain ways that
seem irrational to others around. We have to tell ourselves not to feel ashamed by
telling ourselves that it is not catastrophic if someone thinks we are foolish. The
main point of these exercises is that clients work to feel unashamed even when
others clearly disapprove of them. This procedure typically involves both emotive
and behavioural components. Clients may accept a homework assignment to take
the risk of doing something that others are likely to disapprove of.
Activity 7: Give example of one situation that you would use to help people
reduce shame over behaving in certain ways that seems irrational to others
around.
/
Cognitive Behavioural
Approaches
33

Schools of Counselling
and Psychotherapy
34
Force and Vigour
These can be used as a way to help clients go from intellectual to emotional insight.
Clients are also shown how to conduct forceful dialogues with themselves in which
they express their irrational beliefs and then powerfully dispute them. The therapist
can also engage in reverse role playing by strongly clinging to the client's selfdefeating philosophy; the client is asked to vigorously debate with the therapist in
an attempt to persuade him or her to give up these dysfunctional ideas.
Activity 8: Conduct forceful dialogues with yourselves in which you express
your irrational beliefs and then powerfully dispute them.
3. Behavioural Techniques
These make use of behaviour therapy procedures, especially operant conditioning,
self-management principles, systematic desensitization, relaxation techniques and
modeling.
Behavioural homework assignments to be carried out in real-life situations are done
systematically and are recorded and analyzed on a form. Many involve
desensitization, skill training, and assertiveness training. To desensitize gradually
REBT clients are encouraged to perform the things they are afraid of doing. For
example, a person with a fear of lifts may decrease her or his fears by going up
and down in a lift several times in a day. Clients actually do new and difficult
things, and in this way they put their insights to use in the form of concrete action.
By acting differently, they also tend to incorporate functional beliefs that they can
undertake a task successfully.
• Although REBT uses many other cognitive, emotive and behavioural methods to
help clients minimize their irrational beliefs, it stresses this process of disputing both
during the sessions and in everyday life. Eventually clients arrive at an effective
philosophy, E, which has a practical side. The new and effective rational philosophy
consists of replacing unhealthy thoughts with healthy ones. This further leads to a
)
new set of feelings, F. Thus, instead of berating oneself and punishing oneself with
depression over the failure, one would reach a rational and empirically based
conclusion and may tell oneself. "Well, I'm genuinely sorry for what happened but
that does not mean Although I wish I could have worked things out in a better
way but it isn't the end of the world. I am not wholly responsible for the failure
or disaster". According to REBT theory, the ultimate effect is minimizing feelings
of depression and self condemnation.
Thus philosophical restructuring to make our beliefs functional would involve
following steps: (1) fully acknowledging that we are largely responsible for creating
- our own emotional problems; (2) accepting the notion we have the ability to changej
/
these disturbances significantly; (3) recognizing that our emotional problems largely
stem from irrational beliefs; (4) clearly perceiving these beliefs; (5) seeing the value
of disputing such self-defeating beliefs; (6) accepting the fact that if we expect to
change we had better work hard in emotive and behavioural ways to counteract our
beliefs and the dysfunctional feelings and actions that follow; and (7) practising
REBT methods of uprooting or changing disturbed consequences for the rest of our
life.
6.3.2 Application to Family Therapy
The cognitive behavioural approach focuses on family interaction patterns, and
family relationships, cognitions, emotions, and behaviour are viewed as exerting a
mutual influence on one another. A cognitive inference can evoke emotion and
behaviour, and emotion and behaviour can likewise influence cognition in a reciprocal
process that sometimes serves to maintain the dysfunction of the family unit.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
l. State whether 'True' or 'False':
i) Appropriate and inappropriate emotions are a result of our
thoughts. TIF
ii) Modifying our beliefs about things and events can help us deal
effectively with everyday problems. TIF
iii) REBT' focuses on past events rather than current situations. TIF
iv) REBT can help people to change their thoughts and behaviour. TIF
6.4 COGNITIVE THERAPY BY AARON BECK
Cognitive Therapy (CT) works by changing people's attitudes and their behaviour.
The CT 'model' or theory believes that it is not events themselves that upset us,
but the meanings we attach to them. Our thoughts come in the way of our seeing
things that don't fit in our framework or with what we believe to be true. Thus, we
continue to hold on to the same old beliefs and fail to perceive anything new. These
irrational beliefs that have been acquired and self-constructed are maintained and
self-indoctrinated. The client is taught the skills that give them the tools to identify
.and dispute these irrational beliefs. In this process of counselling, the client learns
to replace ineffective ways of thinking with effective and rational cognitions. As a
consequence of this, they change their emotional reactions to situations. This is
learnt by them as that they can apply to .many other problems in life or future
problems that they may encounter later in life.
For example, a depressed woman may think, 'I can't face going into work today:
1 can't do it. Nothing will go right. I'll feel awful'. As a result of having these
thoughts - and of believing them - she may well ring in sick. By behaving like
this, she won't have the chance to find out that her prediction was wrong. She
might have found some things she could do, and at least some things that were
/Cognitive Behavioural
Approaches
35

Schools of CounseUing
and Psychotherapy
36
 ...
okay. But, instead, she stays at home, brooding about her failure to go in and
ends up thinking: 'I have let everyone down. They will be angry with me. Why
can't I do what everyone else does? I am so weak and useless'. So, that woman
.probably ends up feeling worse, and has even more difficulty going in to work
the next day. Thinking, behaving and feeling like this may start a downward spiraL
This vicious circle can apply to many different kinds of problems.
6.4.1 Basic Principles of Cognitive Therapy
Beck contends that people with emotional difficulties tend to commit characteristic
"logical errors" that tilt objective reality in the direction of self-deprecation.
Cognitive therapy perceives psychological problems as stemming from commonplace
processes such as faulty thinking, making incorrect inferences on the basis of
inadequate or in correct information, and failing to distinguish between fantasy
and reality. Let's examine some of the systematic errors in reasoning that lead
to faulty assumptions and misconceptions, which are termed cognitive distortions:
• Arbitrary inferences in which we make conclusions without supporting and
relevant evidence. This includes "catastrophizing," or thinking of the absolute
worst scenario and outcomes for most situations e.g. you may have the
conviction that you will not be liked or valued by others.
_. Selective abstraction in which we form conclusions based on an isolated
detail of an event. In this process, other information is ignored, and the
significance of the total context is missed. The assumption is that the events
that matter are those dealing with failure and deprivation. As a professional,
you might assess your worth by one mistake and not by your successes.
• Overgeneralization which a process of holding extreme beliefs on the basis
of a single incident and applying them inappropriately to events or settings
that are not common to the one from which it is being generalized. If you
have difficulty working with one adolescent, for example, you might conclude
that you. will not be good at working in any situation.
• Magnification consists of perceiving a case or situation in a greater light
than it truly deserves, for example, assuming that even minor mistakes in
your profession as a teacher could easily create a crisis for the individual
•
and might result in psychological damage. Such a type of behaviour on your
part would make a cognitive error.
• Personalization is a tendency for individuals to relate external events to
themselves, even when there is no basis for making this connection. If a
\ person does not give an appointment to you for a second time, you may
be convinced that this 'evasive' behaviour on his part is due to your terrible
performance during your first visit. You might tell yourself, "This situation
proves that my work will not be done".
• Labeling and mislabeling involve portraying one's identity 00 the basis of
imperfections and mistakes made in the past and allowing them to define
one's true identity. For example a child with physical challenges may not
create an image where people would have expectations from him and the
child may tell himself, "I am totally worthless and cannot achieve anything
in life".
/
• Polarized thinking involves thinking and interpreting in all-or-nothing terms,
or categorizing experiences in either-or extremes. With such dichotomous
thinking, events are labeled in black or white terms. You might give yourself
no latitude for being an imperfect person. You might view yourself as either
being the perfectly competent person who has to outshine in every activity or
as a total flop if you are not fully competent (which means there is no room
for any mistakes).
Beck (1976) wrote that, in the broadest sense, "cognitive therapy consists of all the
approaches that alleviate psychological distress through the medium of correcting
faulty conceptions and self-signals". For him the most direct way to change
dysfunctional emotions and behaviours is to modify inaccurate and dysfunctional
thinking. The cognitive therapist teaches clients how to identify these distorted and
dysfunctional cognitions through a process of evaluation. Through a collaborative
effort, clients learn to discriminate between their own thoughts and events that occur
in reality. They learn the influence that cognition has on their feelings and behaviours
and even on environmental events. Clients are taught to recognize, observe, and
monitor their own thoughts and assumptions, especially their negative automatic
thoughts.
6.4.2 Genesis of the Problem
Beck suggested that thinking patterns are set up in childhood, and become automatic
and relatively fixed. So, a child who didn't get much unconditional affection from
the parents but was praised for school work, might come to think, "I have to do
well all the time. If I don't, people will reject me". Such a rule for living (known
as a 'dysfunctional assumption') may help them to work hard. But if something
happens that's beyond their control and they experience failure, then the dysfunctional
thought pattern may be triggered. The person may then begin to have 'automatic'
thoughts like, "I have completely failed. No one will like me. I can't face them".
CT acts to help the person understand that this is what's going on. It helps her or
him to step outside their automatic thoughts and test them out. CT would help the
client with a problem to examine real-life experiences to see what happens to them,
or to others, in similar situations. Then, in the light of a more realistic perspective,
they may be able to take the chance of testing out what other people think by
discussing their difficulties.
Clearly, negative things can and do happen. But when we are in a disturbed state
of mind, we may base our predictions and interpretations on a biased view of the
situation. This makes the difficulty that we face appear much worse. CT helps
people to correct these misinterpretations.
6.4.3 Homework!Assignment
Working on homework assignments between sessions is a vital part of the process.
Assignments can be of varied nature. For example, at the start of the therapy, the
therapist might ask the client to keep a diary of any incidents that provoke feelings
of anxiety or depression, so that they can examine thoughts surrounding the incident.
Later on in the therapy, another assignment might consist of exercises to cope with
problem situations of a particular kind.
6.4.4 The Importance of Structure
The reason for having structure is that it helps to use the counselling time most
efficiently. It also makes sure that important information isn't missed out and that
/
Cognitive Behavioural
Approaches
37

Schools of Counselling
and Psychotherapy
38
both, therapist and client, think about new assignments that naturally follow from the
session. Initially, the therapist takes an active part in structuring the sessions .
.Check Your Progress Exercise 3
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. List the basic principles of cognitive therapy.
6.5 DONALD MEICHENBAUM'S COGNITIVE
BEHAVIOUR MODIFICATION
This approach shares with REBT and Beck's cognitive therapy the assumption that
distressing emotions are typically the result of maladaptive thoughts.
Donald Meichenbaum's cognitivebehaviour modification (CBM) focuses on changing
the client's self-verbalisation. According to Meichenbaum (1977), self-statements
affect a person's behaviour in much the same way as statements made by another
person. A basic premise of CBM is that clients, as a prerequisite to behaviour
change, must notice how they think, feel and behave and the impact they have on
others. For change to occur, clients need to interrupt the scripted nature of their
behaviour so that they can evaluate their behaviour in various situations.
Cognitive restructuring plays a central role in Meichenbaum's approach. He describes
cognitive structure as the organizing aspect of thinking, which seems to monitor and
direct the choice of thoughts.
Cognitive structures, and behaviours and their resultant outcomes; Meichenbaum
describes a three-phase process of change in which these three aspects are
interwoven:
Phase 1: Self-observation: The beginning step consists of clients learning how to
observe their own behaviour. Initially, their internal dialogue is characterized by
negative self-statements and imagery. This process involves an increased sensitivity
to their thoughts, feeling, actions, physiological reactions, and ways of reacting to
others.
Phase 2: Starting a new internal dialogue: As a result of the early contacts with
the therapist, clientslearn to notice their maladaptive behaviours, and see opportunities
for adaptive behavioural alternatives, and change their internal dialogue through
therapy. Their new internal dialogue serves as a guide to new behaviour.
/
/ I
Phase 3: Learning new skills: The third phase of the modification process
consists of teaching clients more effective coping skills, which are practised in reallife situations. At the same time, clients continue to focus on telling themselves new
sentences and observing and assessing the outcomes. The stability of what they
learn is greatly influenced by what they say to themselves about their newly acquired
behaviour and its consequences.
Stress management training has potentially useful applications for a wide variety of
problems and clients;both for remediation and prevention. Some of these applications
include anger control, anxiety management, assertion training, improving creative
thinking, treating depression, and dealing with health problems.
The Constructivist Perspective
The constructivist perspective focuses on the capacity of human beings for creative
and imaginative thoughts. At the core of constructivist theory is a view of people
as active agents who are able to derive meaning out of their experiential world.
Thus, the process of change can be facilitated, but not directed by a therapist.
Constructivism stresses the client's reality without disputing whether it is accurate
or rational. '
Meichenbaum operates on the assumption that there are multiple realities and one
of the therapeutic tasks is to help clients appreciate how they construct their realities
and how they write their own stories.
Meichenbaum states that the constructivist approach to cognitive behaviour therapy
is less structured and more discovery-oriented than standard cognitive therapy. The
constructivist approach gives more emphasis to past development, tends to target
deeper core beliefs, and explores the behavioural impact and emotional toll a client
pays for clinging to certain root metaphors. REBT challenges the irrationality of
client's thoughts and beliefs, whereas constructivist therapists are concerned with
helping clients explore how they create their realities and the consequences that
follow from such constructions.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. Fill in the blanks:
i) CBM shares with REBT and Beck's cognitive therapy the assumption
the are typically the result of maladaptive thoughts.
ii) CBM focuses on changing the client's _
iii) Self-statements affect a person's in much the same
way as statements made by another person.
iv) A basic premise of CBM is that clients, as a prerequisite to
______ ',must notice how they think, feel and behave and the
impact they have on others.
/\Cognitive Behavioural
Approaches
39

Schools of Counselling
and Psychotherapy
40
v) Meichenbaum's approach describes cognitive structure as
______ , which seems to monitor and direct the choice of
thoughts.
vi) The constructivist perspective focuses on for creative
and imaginative thoughts.
vii)Constructivist approach to cognitive behaviour therapy is less
______ and discovery-oriented than standard
cognitive therapy.
viii)Meichenbaum operates on the assumption that there are _
and one of the therapeutic tasks is to help clients appreciate how they
construct their realities.
2. Order the following steps of the process of change during a CBM session
as they occur:
i) Starting to change self-verbalization. _
ii) Learning new coping effective skills. _
iii) Observation of self thoughts to recognise thoughts and feelings.
6.6 THERAPIST'S FUNCTIONS AND ROLE
Following are the major functions and role of therapist:
• Encourages clients to discover a few basic irrational ideas that motivate much
disturbed behaviour,
• Challenges clients to validate their ideas,
• Demonstrates to clients the illogical nature of their thinking,
•
• Uses humour to confront the irrationality of clients' thinking,
• Uses a logical analysis to minimize these irrational beliefs,
• Shows how these beliefs are inoperative and how they will lead to future
emotional and behaviour disturbances,
I
IJ1• Explains how these ideas can be replaced with more rational ideas that are
empirically grounded,
• Teaches clients how to apply the scientific approach to thinking so that they
can observe and minimize present or future irrationalideas and illogicaldeductions
that foster self-destructive ways of feeling and behaving, and
/
• Uses several cognitive, emotive, and behavioural methods to help clients work
directly on their feelings and to act against their disturbances.
6.7 DIFFERENCES AND SIMILARITIES
BETWEEN REBT, CT AND CBM
In both Beck's cognitive therapy and REBT, reality testing is highly organized.
Clients come to realize that they have interpreted situations in different way and that
their beliefs are not realistic. Yet, there are some important differences between
REBT, CT, and CBM, especially with respect to therapeutic methods and style.
REBT er CBM
Ellis Beck Meichenbaum
Highly directive, Uses a Socratic More direct and
persuasive and dialogue by posing confrontationalin
confrontive. ,open-ended questions uncovering and
to clients. disputingirrational
Focuses on teaching Gets clients to focus thoughts.
role of therapist. on personal issues and
arrive at their own
conclusions.
The therapist works Therapist places more Selfinstructional
through a process of emphasis on helping therapy focuses
rational disputation clients discover their more on helping
to persuade clients misconceptions for clients become
that certain of their themselves and aware of their selfbeliefs are irrational. generally applies more dialogue.
structure than REBT.
Does not agree with The therapeutic
REBT's concept of process consists of
irrational beliefs as training clientsto
such a message to the modify the
client can be instructionsthey
detrimental because give to themselves
clients believe they are so that they can
rational and realistic. cope.
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. State whether the statement is "True" or "False":
D REBT is often highly directive, persuasive, and confrontive and focuses
on the teaching role of the therapist. _
. ---------------------------
/
Cognitive Behavioural
Approaches
41
Schools of Counselling
and Psychotherapy ii) Beck uses a Socratic dialogue by posing open-ended questions to
clients with the aim of getting clients to reflect on personal issues and
arrive at their own conclusions.
-----
iii) The REBT therapist works through a process of rational disputation to
persuade clients that certain of their beliefs are irrational. _
iv) Cl' therapists view dysfunctional beliefs as being problematic because
they interfere with normal cognitive processing, not because they are
irratiOfial. _
v) REBT is different from CBM as it is more direct and confrontational in
uncovering and disputing irrational thoughts; Meichenbacum's self
instructional therapy focuses more on helping clients become aware of
their self-dialogue. _
vi) The therapeune 1ft e13M: process consists of training clients to modify
th~ ifistftktlons they give to themselves so that they can cope more
effectively with the problems they encounter, _
6.7.1, Difference From Other Therapies
CBT also differs ftom other therapies in the nature of the relationship that the
therapist will try to establish. Some therapies encourage the client to be dependent
on the therapist, as part of the treatment process. The client can then easily come
to see the therapist as all-knowing and all-powerful. The relationship is different
with CBT.
CBT favours 'collaborative empiricism' that is client and therapist work together
to test out how the ideas behind CBT might apply to the client's individual life. It
is a more equal relationship that is more business-like, being problem-focused and
practical. The therapist frequently asks the client for feedback and for views about
what is going-on 1fitherapy.
People who describe having particular problems are often the most suitable for
CBT. It's likely to be more helpful for anyone who can relate to CBT's ideas, its
problem-solving approach and the need for practical self-assignments. People tend
to prefer CBT if they want a more 'practical treatment, where gaining insight is not
the main aim.
6.8 WHAT TYPES OF PROBLEMS CAN BE
ADDRESSED BY THIS APPROACH?
Some of the situations or problems where CBT has been successful are:
• Anger management,
• Anxiety and panic attacks,
• Child' and adolescent problems,
-'
• Depression,
• Drug or alcohol problems,
42 •
Eating problems,
/
•
General health problems, . Cognitive Behavioural
Approaches
• Habits, such as facial tics,
• Mood swings,
• Obsessive-compulsive disorder,
•
Phobias,
•
Post-traumatic stress disorder,
•
Sexual and relationship problems,
•
Sleep problems,
•
Sleeping difficulties,
•
Relationship problems, arid
• Drug and alcohol abuse.
CBT cannot cure all of the above problems. For example, it cannot cure chronic
pain or disorders such as chronic fatigue syndrome. However, it might help people
with arthritis or chronic fatigue syndrome, to fmd new ways of coping while living
with the disorders.
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. State the types of problems where you can use CBT.
6.9 CRITIQUE OF COGNITIVE BEHAVIOURAL
THERAPY
6.9.1 Merits of Cognitive Behavioural Therapy
An important advantage of CBT is that it tends to be short. It may take only three
to six months for most emotional problems if sessions are held once a week, each
session lasting about 50 minutes to an hour. During this time, the client and therapist
work together to understand what the problems are and to develop a new strategy
for tackling them. CBT orients the clients to a set of principles that they can apply
whenever they need throughout their lives.
43
/
Schools of Counselling
and Psychotherapy
44
6.9.2 Limitations of Cognitive Behavioural Therapy
Everybody can not benefit, at least not to full recovery, in a short span of time.
Sometimes, therapy may have to go on longer to do justice to the number of
problems and to the length of time the problems have existed.
6.9.3 How Does CBT Work in Learning Coping Skills
CBT tries to teach people skills for dealing with their problems. A new strategy for
coping can lead to more lasting changes to basic attitudes and ways of behaving.
The anxious client may learn to avoid avoiding things! She or he may also find that
anxiety is not as dangerous as they assumed it to be. She or he may learn to
change beliefs and behaviours.
One-to-one CBT can bring the client into a kind of relationship they may not have
had before. The 'collaborative' stylemeans that they are actively involved in changing.
The methods of CBT may be useful in solving life problems that may have been
long-standing and stuck.
Case Illustration of A-B-C-D-E Analysis
The Case of Yvonne (Source Sherilyn Cormier L. & Harold Hackney, The
professional counsellor: A process guide to helping. Boston: Allyn and Bacon.
Pp. 145-147)
This case illustrates the use of the A-B-C-D-E analysis that one counsellor used
with an individual client over a period of time. The client was seen weekly for
approximately twenty sessions.
Yvonne is a thirty-year-old woman who presents for counselling because of
"mood swings" and "depression." Assessment reveals that Yvonne's depression
began about three years ago, following her divorce from her husband. During the
last three years, Yvonne reports periodic bouts of depression that seem to stem
largely from thoughts of failure and guilt. Specifically,Yvonne blames herself and
feels like a failure because of the divorce. She states that she cannot get rid of
thoughts that she is a failure and that she is to blame for the breakup of the
mamage.
• History and intake: Yvonne is of above-average intelligence and possesses a
masters degree in business. She is currently employed as a marketing analyst for
a large chain of fast food restaurants. She dates some men from time to time but
has not been involved in a serious or steady relationship since her divorce three
years ago. She apparently is in excellent health.
After intake and assessment sessions, the counsellor proposes the use of the AB-C-D-E analysis to Yvonne. The counsellor speculates that Yvonne is a good
candidate.for this technique because her depression seems to be largely the result
of errors in cogniti ye thinking, she processes information dealing with internal
dialogue or self-talk easily, she is above-average in intelligence. She is moderately
distressed, and she seems willing and able to think logically and to carry out
systematic assignments as part of her counselling programme.
The counsellor first giyes Yvonne an overview of the strategy and tells her how
it may be helpful, stressing the fact that her continued thoughts of failure and self-
/
blame, not her divorce per se, are largely responsible for creating her moodiness
and down feelings. The counsellor uses examples and analogies to emphasize
how the strategy will help Yvonne acquire more realistic thinking, give up selfdefeating ways of thinking, and achieve a state of less emotional distress. As soon
as Yvonne indicates that it is plausible to her that thoughts cause feelings, the
counsellor can begin A-B-C-D-E work with her.
First, the counsellor helps Yvonne identify any situations which she feels are
responsible for her emotional distress. Yvonne indicates that the primary one is
her divorce. She states, "If I were still happily married, I wouldn't feel this way."
At this point, the counsellor helps Yvonne to explore and determine whether this
situation is something she has the control to change or not. When Yvonne indicates
she does not, the counsellor points out that her thoughts and feelings about the
situation can change, even though 'the external event will not. The counsellor also
has Yvonne try on the following sentence, "Just because my marriage did not
work out does not mean I have to feel terribly upset and depressed".
Next, the counsellor helps Yvonne identify more specifically the emotional
consequences or feelings she is having about the divorce. Yvonne's primary
feelings seem to be frustration and depression. These are supported by her nonverbal behaviours like: she frequently looks down at the floor, speaks slowly in
,a low, soft voice, and appears listless or lethargic. The counsellor emphasizes that
Yvonne can decide whether she wants to keep or change these feelings so that
they do not keep producing so much distress for her. The counsellor also helps
Yvonne explore ways in which these feelings are debilitating to her everyday life
situations; for example, to what extent have they been keeping her from getting
more involved with other men?
At this point, the counsellor and Yvonne are ready to spend some time working
with the Bs+-her beliefs, thoughts, or internal "self-talk". The counsellor reiterates
that some beliefs can cause unnecessary levels of emotional distress, particularly
those that are self- defeating or cannot be supported by data, facts, or external
evidence. The counsellor gives some examples of these and contrasts them to
more rational or self-enhancing beliefs. Thoughts such as, "I'm a failure", "It's
my fault the marriage didn't work out", are presented to Yvonne as examples of
self-defeating thoughts. Thoughts such as, "The marriage failed - I didn't", or
"The marriage didn't work out-I'm still intact", are presented as examples of
self-enhancing thoughts. The counsellor encourages Yvonne to close her eyes,
imagine or recreate the situation surrounding the divorce, and note what she is
thinking about or what is going through her mind at this point. Yvonne indicates
again that her primary thoughts are:
• "I'm a failure because my marriage didn't work out".
• "I was the wife, and I should have kept the marriage together. It's up to
the wife to do that. It's my fault we couldn't work things out".
• "It's terrible to be thirty years old and divorced".
Yvonne's Bs share common characteristics that are typically associated with
depression:
1. Belief in one's inadequacy.
/
Cognitive Behavioural
Approaches
45
Schools of Counselling
and Psychotherapy
.46
2. Horror of not having what you need.
3. Awfulness of the way things are.
.In addition, Bs of depressed clients are usually full of self-blame and self-pity.
Next, the counsellor is ready to start helping Yvonne learn how to dispute the
emotional beliefs. Because the effects of disputation are usually more long-lasting
if a variety of methods are used, the counsellor starts with cognitive disputation,
followed by imaginal and behavioural disputation.
For cognitive disputation, the counsellor uses a series of questions to help Yvonne
examine and dispute the Bs on a sentence-by-sentence basis. For example, the
counsellor takes the first B on Yvonne's list ("I'm a failure because my marriage
didn't work out") and asks Yvonne to challenge this statement using the following
kinds of questions:
• Can you prove that?
• How do you know that?
• Where is that written?
• Where will this assumption get you?
• As long as you believe that, how will you feel?
This same process then occurs with all the other Bs identified by Yvonne and the
counsellor. •.
6.11 LET US SUM UP
In this Unit, we have studied cognitive behavioural approaches to family therapy.
The Unit begins with the history of cognitive behavioural therapy which includes
approaches like REBT, CT and CBM propounded by the pioneering experts. The
Unit discusses the concept of cognitive behavioural therapy which includes rational
emotive behavioural therapy by Ellis and its applications to family therapy. Further,
we studied about the cognitive therapy by Aaron Beck which includes basic principles
of cognitive therapy, genesis of the problem and the importance of structure. The
• Unit also described Donald Meichenbaum's cognitive behaviour modification
approach. The focus was given on the construction perspective. The role and
functions of the therapist in cognitive behavioural therapy were also discussed.
Further, the Unit differentiated between REST, CT and CBM. The Unit highlighted
the types of problems that can be addressed by this approach. At the end of the
Unit, merits·and limitations of cognitive behavioural therapy were discussed.
6.12 GLOSSARY
CBM Cognitive Behaviour ModifIcation.
CBT ' .Cognitive Behavioural Therapy.
Cognitive behaviour therapy An active type of psychotherapy in which
the client and the counsellor talk, act and
work together to achieve goals that are
mutually agreed.
/
Magnification Perceiving a ease or situation in a greater
light than it truly deserves.
Personalization A tendency for individuals to relate external
events to themselves.
REBT Rational Emotive Behaviour Therapy.
6.13 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1. i) cognition, behavioural .
ii) Albert Ellis, Aaron T. Beck and Donald Meichenbeum
2. i) False
ii) True
Check Your Progress Exercise 2 .
1. i) True
ii) True
iii) False
iv) True
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1. Following are the basic principles of cognitive therapy:
i) Arbitrary inferences,
ii) Selective abstraction,
iii) Overgeneralization,
iv) Magnification and minimization,
v) Personalization,
vi) Labeling and mislabeling, and
vii) Polarized thinking.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
i) distressing emotions
ii) seli-verbalisation
iii) behaviour
iv) behaviour change
/
Cognitive Behavioural
Approaches
47
1
Schools of Counselling
and Psychotherapy
v) the organizing aspect of thinking
vi) the capacity of human beings
vii) structured, more
viii) multiple realities
2. i) -·2, ii) - J, iii) - 1.
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
1. i) True
ii) True
iii) True
iv) True
v) True
vi) True
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
1. Following are the types of problems where one can use CBT:
i) Anger management,
ii) Anxiety and panic attacks,
iii) Child and adolescent problems,
iv) Depression,
v) Drug or alcohol problems, .
vi) Eating problems,
vii) General health problems,
viii) Habits, such as facial tics, •
ix) Mood swings,
x) Obsessive-compulsive disorder,
xi) Phobia,
xii) Post-traumatic stress disorder,
xiii) Sexual and relationship problems,
xiv) Sleep problems,
xv) Sleep difficulties,
xvi) Relationship problem, and
48 xvii) Drug and alcohol abuse.
/
6.14 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. List the cognitive behavioural approaches.
2. How would you go about desensitization of a client who has phobia of
darkness?
3. How would you provide assertive training to a client of yours who cannot talk
to her parents about her problems?
6.15 FUTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES
1. Burns D. D. (1990). The feeling good handbook. ·New Delhi: Penguin.
2. Sherilyn, C. L. & Harold, H. The professional counsellor: A process guide
to helping. Boston: Allyn and Bacon. (pp. 145-147)
/
Cognitive Behavioural
Approaches
49

UNIT 7 PERSON·CENTERED
COUNSELLING
Structure
7.1 Intoduction
7.2 A~sumptions
7.3 Evolution of Person-Centered Approach
7.4 Major Concepts .
7.4.1 Actualizing Tendency
7.4.2 Self-Concept
7.4.3 Organismic Valuing Process
7.4.4 Need for Positive Regard
7.5 Counselling Process
7.5.1 Goals of Person-Centered Counselling
7.5.2 Conditions for Person-Centered Counselling
7.6 Core Conditions for Growth
7.6.1 Congruence
7.6.2 Empathic Understanding
7.6.3 Unconditional Positive Regard
7.7 Strategies for Providing The Core Conditions
7.7.1 Communicating Empathic Understanding
7.7.2 Communicating Congruence
7.7.3 Communicating Unconditional Positive Regard
7.11 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
7.8 Limitations and Criticism
7.9 Let Us Sum Up
7.10 Glossary
7.1 INTODUCTION
7.12 Unit End Questions
7.13 Further Readings and References
50 (Rogers, 1986)
"It is that the individual has within himself or herself vast resources for selfunderstanding, for altering his or her self-concept, attitudes and self-directed
behaviour - and that these resources can be tapped if only a definable climate
of facilitative psychological attitudes can be provided".
/
These words of Carl R. Rogers best describe the philosophy behind the Personcentered approach to counselling and family therapy. Rooted in the HumanisticExistential family of therapies, person-centered approach has created the most
momentous wave in the area of counselling and family therapy. Rogers is also
known as "Father of Counselling Psychology".
Rogers firmly believed in the self-actualizingpotential of each individual. He followed
a non-directive therapeutic system, which ensured that the therapeutic setting
provided the vital conditions for nurturing the growth of the individual. Personcentered approach is not only a psychotherapy system, it is a "point of view, a
philosophy, an approach to life, a way of being, which fits any situation in which
growth - of a person, a group or a community - is part of the goal". (Rogers,
1980)
Person-Centered
Counselling
"The central truth for Rogers was that the person knows best. It is the person who
knows what hurts and where the pain lies and it is that person who will discover
the way forward. The task of the counsellor is to be the kind of companion who
can relate to the person in such a way that she or he can access own wisdom and
recover self direction". (Mearns, 2007)
Objectives:
After studying this Unit, you will be able to:
• Describe the philosophical assumptions of the person-centered approach to
counselling;
• Discuss the person-centered understanding of major theoretical constructs of
.person-centered counselling;
• Summarize the necessary conditions under which psychological growth and/or
behaviour changes occur according to this counselling approach;
• Explain the etiology of maladaptive behaviour based on person-centered
couhselling.
• Describe the skills required for providing the core conditions in the therapeutic
relationship;
• Demonstrate the specific procedures and techniques that facilitate constructive
client change in person-centered counselling;
• Discuss the similarities and differences of person-centered and other approaches
to counselling; and
• Evaluate the limitations and contributions of the person-centered approach to
counselling.
51
7.2 ASSUMPTIONS
Person-centered approach is a way of being with people based on a theory of
helping relationships which, in turn, rests on a deep respect for and trust in the
individual's capacity for growth, development and creativity. It is a democratic,
non-authoritarian and non-directive approach to people that emphasises constructive
human relationships as the key to the change process.
/ I
Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
52
Person-centered approach challenged the prevalent belief of human behaviour
being driven by negative impulses. Rogers supported the belief that humans were
basically good and could be trusted to direct their own lives. Unlike the
psychodynamic viewpoint, the person-centered counselling is rooted in the here
and now and not in the childhood events.
Rogers was able to bring about an attitudinal shift by making a pivotal change
to the way an individual was addressed and looked upon in the therapeutic
system. He objected to the term 'patient' and replaced it with 'client' (who
comes actively and voluntarily to gain help for the problem and is not a helpless
being).
Rogers therapeutic intervention involves the counsellor's entry into the person's
unique world. Rogers maintained that we behave as we do because of the way
we perceive our situation. "As no one else can know how we perceive, we
are the best experts on ourselves" (Gross, 1992). Rogers postulated that persons
possess resources of self-knowledge and self-healing, and that personality change
. and development are possible if a definable climate of facilitative conditions is
present (Rogers, 1980). This implies that certain persons and environments
foster growth and development in human beings, and some undermine and inhibit
growth.
This tenet formed the foundation for the revolutionary treatment approach that
is based on the personal characteristics of the counsellor than on any techniques.
Rogers challenged the psychotherapy community by formally articulating the belief
that the "facilitative conditions" of empathy, positive regard, and genuineness on
the part of the counsellor were the necessary and sufficient conditions for therapy
(Rogers, 1957). The therapeutic relationship is the essence of person-centered
therapy.
Rogers' theory emphasises the counsellor's creation of a permissive and noninterventionist climate in which the client is free to move at her or his own
pace and in her or his own direction. Rogers actively promotes that the attitude,
personal characteristics and qualities of the counsellor are the prime determinants
of the successful outcomes of the therapeutic process.
Central to Rogers' theory is the notion of self or self concept. This is defined
as, "the organized, consistent set of perceptions and beliefs about oneself'. It
consists of all the ideas and values t'hat characterize 'I' and 'me' and includes
perception of 'what I am' and 'what I can do'. Consequently, the self-concept
is a central component of an individual's total experience and influences both
his or her perception of the world and perception of oneself. For instance,
a child who perceives herself or himself as strong may behave with confidence
and come to see her or his actions as actions performed by someone who
is confident.
According to Rogers, individuals want to feel, experience and behave in ways
which are consistent with their self-image and which reflect what they would
like to be like, their ideal-self. The closer the self-image and ideal-self are to
each other, the more consistent or congruent they are and the higher is the
sense of self-worth.
Maladjustment
The self-concept does not necessarily always fit with reality, though, and the
way we see ourselves may differ greatly from how others see us. For example,
a person might be very interesting to others and yet consider herself or himself
to be boring. The person judges and evaluates this image, that she or he has
of herself or himself as a bore and this valuing will be reflected in. her or his
self-esteem.
Person-Centered
Counselling
A person is said to be in a state of incongruence if some of the totality of
their experience is unacceptable to them and is denied or distorted in the selfimage. Incongruence is "a discrepancy between the actual experience of the
organism and the self-picture of the individual insofar as it represents that
experience" (Rogers 1957). Such a state of incongruence often leads to confusion
and tension and thus maladjustment. As we prefer to see ourselves in ways
that are consistent with our self-image, we may use defense mechanisms like
denial or repression in order to feel less threatened by some of what we consider
to be our undesirable feelings. A person whose self-concept is incongruent with
her or his real feelings and experiences will defend because the truth hurts.
Here is an example from Rogers (1957).
"An instance would be the mother who develops vague illnesses whenever
her only son makes plans to leave home. The actual desire is to hold on
to her only source of satisfaction. To perceive this in awareness would be
inconsistent with the picture she holds of herself as a good mother. Illness,
however is consistent with her self-concept, and the experience is symbolized
in this distorted fashion. Thus...there is a basic incongruence between the
self as perceived (in this case as an ill mother needing attention) and the
actual experience (in this case a desire to hold onto her son)".
Distortion between an individual's actual experience and self concept make the
person vulnerable and leads to maladjustment. Thus, person-centered counselling
aims to address the incongruence that the individual develops.
7.3 EVOLUTION OF PERSON·CENTERED
APPROACH
Rogers constantly worked and improvised on his theories. Three main phases
in the development of person-centered counselling have been identified:
• Stage 1 Nondirective (1940 - 1950): This phase emphasised acceptance
of the client and establishment of a non-judgmental atmosphere in which
the emphasis was on the skills of the counsellor to promote the counselling
process.
• Stage 2 Client-centered (1950 - 1961): This phase emphasised the
counsellor's attitudes rather than skills, and on reflecting the client's feelings.
Theoretical ideas of resolving discrepancies between the client's 'real' and
'ideal' self became incorporated, and the idea of the counsellor as a person
involved subjectively in the counselling relationship began to take shape.
• Stage 3 Person-centered (1961 - present): This phase put emphasis not
only on the counsellor's attitudes and values but additionally on the
relationship qualities. The counsellor's role is seen even less as skilled
performance and more as an expression of the counsellor being responsively
) engaged with the client. More stress is laid on relational issues.
53
Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy Check Your Progress Exercise 1
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. Defme incongruence.
2. List the three phases in the development of person-centered counselling.
7.4 MAJOR CONCEPTS
Person-centered counselling rests on several important concepts. These theoretical
constructs have been abridged from See (1986).
7.4.1 Actualizing Tendency
According to Rogers, humans have an instinctive need to grow and develop in a
positive direction. However, for this natural tendency to bloom, it must be supported
by a loving and permissive environment. If the environment is nurturing, then the
individual will reach its full potential. The growth process of self-actualization is
characterized by increasing congruence and autonomy.
7.4.2 Self-Concept
According to Rogers, the central personality construct is the image that individuals
have of themselves. It is the sum total of all of the thoughts, feelings, and values held
and their relationships to things and people within the world. The self-concept
determines to a large extent how individuals behave.
.,7.4.3 Organismic Valuing Process IIIn order to satisfy the actualising tendency, we need to know what is of value to 1that growth. This ability to weigh up and to value experiences positively or negatively
is the 'organisrnic valuing process'. If we listen to our 'organisrnic valuing process'
we will know what will help us move towards our potential.
7.4.4 Need for Positive Regard
54
During the early stages of development, there is an inherent need for love, or
positive regard, from others. When significant others provide unconditional love,
/

infants are free to develop according to the actualizing tendency and will learn of
their potential by directly experiencing the world. Because human beings are
instinctively good and act in ways that enhance the organism, this self-directed
search for identity can be trusted to result in a well-developed and congruent
personality. However the environment's provisional love based on an individual's
behaviour can significantly limit the growth. Conditional love cripples development
because it requires that individuals listen to others rather than to themselves. When
individuals conform in order to obtain love, they are living according to values of
others, or what Rogers calls the "conditions of worth". Thus, for facilitating the
actualizing tendency of an individual, providing 'unconditional positive regard' is a
requisite.
Person-Centered
Counselling
7.5 COUNSELLINGPROCESS
7.5.1 Goals of Person-Centered Counselling
Person-centered approach-believes that psychological difficulties are caused primarily
by obstacles in the actualising tendency. The goal of therapy is not only to alleviate
the person's problem but to assist the process of growth. Thus the counselling
process facilitates release of the individual from any constraints or restrictions. The
client is enabled to achieve congruence and to explore their inner experiences that
were denied or distorted.
The entire journey of counselling would be led by the individual who has the route
map for her or his growth and terminate at the destination, which is becoming "fully
functioning". Once the person has reached here, there is absolute acceptance of self
for what they really are, irrespective of others' opinions. As per Rogers, the fully
functioning individualhas:
L Basic trust in self,
n. Openness to experiences,
ill. Willingness to continuous growth, and
IV. Internal source of evaluation.
In brief, person-centered approach aims to develop the above characteristics in the
individual.
7.5.2 Conditions for Person-Centered Counselling
For person-centered counselling to work Rogers said that counselling needed to
take place under the following conditions:
• Two persons are in psychological contact.
• The first, whom we shall term the client, is in a state of incongruence, being
vulnerable and anxious.
• The second person, whom we shall term the therapist or counsellor, is congruent
or integrated in the relationship.
55
/
Schools of Counselling and _ The counsellor experiences unconditional positive regard for the client.
Psychotherapy
_ The counsellor experiences an empathic understanding of the client's internal
frame of reference and endeavours to communicate this experience to the
client
• The communication to the client of the counsellor's empathic understanding
and unconditional positive regard is to a minimal degree achieved.
We shall now understand the various dimensions of the therapeutic process.
1. The Client
People who enter counselling usually are in a vulnerable and anxious state. They
may have had experiences that resulted in immense misery for them. However
during the course of counselling, these individuals undergo a journey and go through
the following stages:
• Stage One: The client is very defensive, and extremely resistant to change.
She or he is apprehensive about the counselling itself, the counsellor and their
decision.
• Stage Two: Client becomes slightly less rigid, and will talk about external
events or other people.Also the client begins to recognize and express previously
denied feelings and moves towards more open and honest communication.
• Stage Three: Client talks about herself or himself, but as an object. Avoids
discussion of present events. She or he gradually gains awareness of the inner
experiences and is able to accept those experiences.
• Stage Four: Client begins to talk about deep feelings and develops a
relationship with the counsellor. Now she or he changes the locus of evaluation
outside themselves to an internal state.
The next three stages represent substantial growth in the person's journey of selfactualization.
- Stage Five: Client can express present emotions, and are beginning to rely
more on their own decision making abilities and increasingly accept more
responsibility for their actions. A decline in negativity, anxiety, self-doubt and
blaming seen in the client.
- Stage Six: The client shows rapid growth toward congruence, and begins to
develop unconditional positive regard for others. This stage signals the end for
the need for formal therapy.
- Stage Seven: The client is a fully functioning, self actualized individual who is
empathic and shows unconditional positive regard for others. This individual
can relate their previous therapy to present day real-life situations.
56
A stage seven person can be fully involved in existential living, that is living in the
moment. Although stage seven's fully functioning individual is the goal of Rogerian
counselling, studiesindicate that Stage four or five is much more commonly reached.
I
/
2. The Counsellor Person-Centered
Counselling
The person-centered approach claims that the personal qualities of the counsellor
are more important than training. The counsellor invariably must realise that she or
he can trust her or his own experiencing and the validity of own perceptions.
In this framework, Rogers describes the counsellor's role as follows:
• The counsellor's attitude towards the client is one of respect as an equal,
• The counsellor provides an atmosphere of acceptance where the client is able
to become more aware of self and is able to explore her or his experiences
and relationships with others,
• The counsellor attempts to understand the client and is genuine and open to
her or his own experience in the counselling relationship,
• The counsellor offers the client unconditional acceptance and empathetic
understanding, and .
• The counsellor does not offer advice.
The counsellor is meant to address the entire person, listening to and responding
empathically to the client's experiences. She or he doesn't set goals for the client,
but for self. The counsellor attempts to understand the client's frame of reference
and its dynamics. The counsellor actively stays engaged with the world of her or
his client, without judgement but with respect and authenticity. She or he is an alert
companion and, simultaneously, an empathic and non-judgemental observer (Merry,
2002).
7.6 CORE CONDITIONS FOR GROWTH
Counsellor attitudes are considered to be of paramount importance in facilitating the
relationship. Throughout her or his professional life, Rogers maintained that there
are three counsellor attributes which create a growth-promoting climate in which
individuals could move forward and become what they are capable of becoming.
These are congruence, empathic understanding and unconditional positive regard.
7.6.1 Congruence
Congruence means that the counsellor's outward responses match their inner
awareness and feelings; that they are genuine, real, open, authentic and transparent.
Rogers stressed that congruence is not a question of the counsellor blurting out
feelings; rather it is a state of being. Feelings are to be expressed only when they
are persistent and of great strength and when communication of them assists the
therapeutic process.
As Rogers states, "When I can accept the fact that I have deficiencies, many
faults, make lots of mistakes, am often ignorant when I should be
knowledgeable, often prejudiced when I should be open-minded, often have
feelings which are not justified by circumstances, then I can be much more
real".
57
/
Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
58
Endeavouring to be so open the counsellor acts as a role model sending the
message that it's okay to feel and communicate feelings. In order to develop and
maintain congruence counsellors need to constantly work at being aware of their
underlying feelings. The extent to which the counsellor is deeply in touch with her
or his own feelings and attitudes and expresses them in deeply felt ways to the client
is the extent to which therapy will be facilitated (Rogers, 1977).
7.6.2" Empathic Understanding
Empathy is the process of understanding another person 'as if you were that
person but without ever losing the 'as if' quality'. Rogers described it as a way of
'laying aside our own views and values in order to enter another's world without
prejudice, A Way of Being (Rogers, 1943). If the 'as if' quality is lost then the
process can become one of identification whereby the counsellor is no longer
understanding the event from the client's frame of reference but rather from their
own experience of a similar event. Rogers eloquently described this condition:
"The way of being with another person which is termed empathic has several
facets. It means entering the private, perceptual world of the other and
becoming thoroughly at home in it. It involves being sensitive, moment to
moment, to the changing felt meanings which flow in the other person, to the
fear or rage or tenderness or confusion or whatever, that he/she is
experiencing. It means temporarily living hislher life, moving about in it
delicately without making judegments, sensing meanings of which he/she is
scarcely aware, but not trying to uncover feelings of which the person is
totally unaware, since this would be too threatening" (Rogers, 1980).
Research has shown clearly that when clients' experience their counsellors as deeply
empathic they are helped to explore their inner selves more profoundly and change
is more likely to occur; alienated clients also feel more connected and less isolated'.
7.6.3 Unconditional Positive Regard
Unconditional positive regard on the part of the counsellor means that the counsellor
offers the person respect, acceptance (it does not have to be approval), caring and
appreciation regardless of the client's attitude or behaviour. Rogers often used the
word 'prizing' to convey the meaning of this condition .
•
Unconditional positive regard involves accepting the client's own personal constructs/
personal values/valuing system. It would be possible to imagine conflict between the
valuing systems of counsellor and client. The person-centered counsellor allows
herself or himself to accept the valuing systems of clients which are far removed
from her or his own. This does not mean that the counsellor must share the client's
values, or pretend that she or he shares the client's values. She or he is required
to accept in full that the client's values are the client's values, that the client is
entitled to hold those values for as long as the client wishes, that the client's values
are not deficient (however much they may appear to be deficient from the standpoint
of the counsellor's values), and that the client's values may never change.
This condition is important because it undermines the clients' beliefs that they are
only valued if they behave as required by significant others. There is no longer any
need for the client to shy away from aspects of her or his inner self which may be
painful or shameful- because she or he learns that it is possible to be truly herself
or himself and still be accepted.
/

...................................................... ··························i····························
Person-Centered Check Your Progress Exercise 2 Counselling
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space provided
below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. List the major concepts of person-centered counselling.
2. What are the qualities of fully functioning individual?
3. Define the following terms:
i) Congruence
ii) Empathy
iii) Unconditional positive regard
7.7 STRATEGIES FOR PROVIDING THE CORE
CONDmONS
Rogers has emphasized on the therapeutic relationship and the environment being
critical to the process of growth of the client. So there are certain strategies that
can be deployed in order to make sure the core conditions are provided in the
therapeutic environment. However these strategies are the way of being for the
counsellor in the relation.
7.7.1 Communicating Empathic Understanding
As discussed earlier, empathic understanding means perceiving the world from
the client's perspective. However, in order to facilitate the relationship with the 59
/
Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
60
client, the counsellor must also be able to communicate empathy. Some strategies
that allow the counsellor facilitate empathic understanding are verbal and non-verbal
communication of empathy.
1. .Attending: Communicating Empathy Non-verbally
To understand the client's inner world, the counsellor must attend to the client.
Attending is giving all of your physical and psychological attention to the client. By
attending the counsellor communicates to the client that "I am interested in what you
have to say, 1totally accept you and what you are saying", however, a lack of good
attending communicates that "I really don't care about what you have tosay".
The counsellor's body and facial expressions tell the client if the counsellor is
attending. This is done through positioning the parts of the body so that they invite
and hold an interpersonal relation. A relaxed alertness expressed by body posture
seems best suited for fostering good communication.
1Bolton offers these suggestions to establish a posture of involvement:
• Lean toward the speaker: This posture will communicate energy and
attentiveness. This will also communicate the counsellor's interest and active
involvement in the relationship.
• Face the other squarely: It means your right shoulder to the speaker's left.
This posture communicates your involvement. It is especially important for you
to position yourself so that you are at the eye-level with the client. This will
circumnavigate feelings of threat and can greatly aid in forming an interpersonal
relationship.
• Maintaining an open posture: It is also important for fostering interpersonal
relatedness. A closed posture (that is crossed arms and or legs) often
communicates coldness and defensiveness.
• . Proximity to the client: You also need to be aware of your proximity to the
client. We all have a concept of "personal space." When those boundaries are
crossed it puts,the other on the defensive and makes them feel uncomfortable.
However, too much distance communicates aloofness and disconnectedness.
• Gestures: Gestures also are used to show attention. The purpose of gesturing
when you are listening is to encourage the client to continue speaking. This can
most easily be done with a periodic head nod.
• Effective eye contact:' It says that you are visually attuned to what the
speaker is saying. Good eye contact involves focusing on the speaker's face
and occasionally shifting the focus to other parts of the body. The key is that
the other is aware that they have your attention because your eyes are "on
them". Good eye contact should seem natural to the other person. Whatever
you do, don't "stare them down". This makes them anxious and sometimes
critical.
The environment where the communication takes place is also an important factor
in whether an interpersonal relationship can be formed. It is not always possible to
move the conversation into a private room or office, but every attempt should be
made to reduce the number of distractions that are present. .
/
In his book, 'The Skilled Helper (1998)" Gerad Egan offers what he has labelled
the 'Micro Skills of Attending' . He has developed the following acronym.
Person-Centered
Counselling
S - face the client Squarely
0- have an Open posture
L- Lean into the conversation
E- Eye contact
R- be Relaxed
2. Reflections: Communicating Empathy Verbally
Understanding the client's world means understanding the client's affective and
cognitive messages and then communicating to her or him the same. One way to
communicate these messages verbally to the client are using reflections.
One way that the counsellor can do this is through paraphrasing. A paraphrase is
a concise response to the client that restates the essence of the communication in
the counsellor's own words. The paraphrase deals with facts or ideas and not the
emotions. In this respect it focuses on the content of the client's message.
In order to paraphrase the following steps can be followed:
I. The counsellor can use the key words and construct systems used by the
client. The idea is to use the main ideas of the client and some of her or his
exact words.
IT. The counsellor can also paraphrase by stating the essence of what the client
has said in her or his own words.
Let's look at a case vignette. The client is narrating his life events after a recent split
from his wife.
Case Vignette
Client: "So many things are going on right now. Another hectic semester
has started, my health is poor, and my mom is ill too. I find myself
running around trying to take care of everything. I am not sure I can take
•
it anymore".
Counsellor: "You're not sure if you can handle all the challenging situations
around you - the hectic semester, your own health concerns, mom sillness".
Another aspect of reflecting is the mirroring back emotions of the client as they
make their statements. It is important to tune into the client's feelings. If we, as
counsellors, miss the feeling content we have missed a major part of the client's
reaction and experience. Reflecting feelings also give the client an opportunity to
evaluate how she or he is responding to a problem situation.
In reflecting the client's feelings, the counsellor could say:
Counsellor: "You appear to be feeling quite overwhelmed by all the things that
are going on around you. I also sense helplessness".
Not only should the listener reflect feeling, she or he also needs to reflect meaning.
Content + feeling = meaning. 61
/
/
Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
62
Reflecting meaning allows the counsellor to be sure that they are "getting" what the
client is saying. Reflecting feeling and content are the baby steps to reflecting
meamng.
In order to reflect on the meaning of the client, the counsellor could say:
Counsellor: "Looks like you're unable to handle all these single handed. You're
missing the support system around you".
Reflections help the counsellor communicate to the client that they are understood
completely.
3. Silence
At many instances during counselling, 'Silence is Golden'. Silence gives that time
to both the client and the counsellor in being in the state, which is the essence of
the person-centered counselling. It helps both to process feelings and meanings.
The silence communicates to the client that "I sense that we need time to deal
with this".
These periods of silence are not uncomfortable to the client. Also, it sends a
message to the client that she or he can take more time to reflect.
7.7.2 Communicating Congruence
Congruence in a relationship implies a measure of equivalence. It is the degree to
which we are able to relate to people in an honest, sincere, and transparent manner.
In person-centered counselling, skills and techniques play a much less important
role than engaging and relating with the client authentically. To be able to demonstrate
congruence in a therapeutic relationship, an awareness of self and an
acknowledgement of our own beliefs, prejudices and values are important. Effective
counselling depends wholly on the degree to which the counsellor is integrated,
open, genuine and self-aware of potential blind spots.
Since counsellors are asking people to take an honest look at themselves and to
make choices concerning how they want to change, it is critical that counsellors
themselves be open to the same kind of personal scrutiny. Genuineness encoura- cc
client's self-disclosure, although, it is imperative to note that congruent r> .
should not feel under any compulsion to disclose: either ab! It eve: .
feeling aroused within the counselling relationship. Counsello», _ lU
keep client's agenda in focus, by recognising and accepting.. . of UlC client's
behaviour that may possibly be conflicting with their own personal values.
According to Egan (1975), in order to communicate congruence, the counsellor
must keep the following aspects in perspective:
1. Spontaneity: A spontaneous person can communicate freely, without constantly
weighing what to say. Spontaneous counsellors behave freely without being
technique or rule bound, without having to hide behind the professional role.
2. Non-defensiveness: A congruent counsellor is non-defensive. They are well
aware about their strong and weak areas. They are open to negative client
expressions without feeling attacked.
I
3. Consistency: Congruent individuals have few discrepancies between what
they think, how they feel and the way they behave. So congruent counsellors
would not think one way about the client, express something else to them and
act in a different way.
Person-Centered
Counselling
4. Sharing of self: Congruent individuals are open to sharing about themselves.
A congruent counsellor would self-disclose when appropriate in order to allow
clients to know them as well.
Being congruent would help the counsellor focus on the client and facilitate the
growth.
7.7.3 Communicating Unconditional Positive Regard
'.
It is one of the three characteristics or attitudes that form an integral part of every
successful therapeutic relationship. This condition exists when the counsellor develops
a warm caring for the client. A caring which is not possessive and demands no
personal gratification. It involves feelings of acceptance of the client's negative,
despondent and painful emotions as well as their positive, good, mature and sociable
feelings.
A counsellor shows acceptance when she or he adopts a non-judgemental stance
in a way that conveys respect, warmth and genuineness. This communicates to the
client a feeling of self-worth and value, and this facilitates a process of self-acceptance
and growth.
In showing acceptance, the client's behaviour is not ignored but rather seen as
reaction to the underlying problem they are presenting. The counsellor's role is to
help in ways which respect the client's values, personal resources and capacity for
self-determination. Counsellors do not automatically jump in to smooth away
unhappiness or try to cheer clients up. Instead, they encourage clients to express
their feelings fully and to come to terms with things as they are at the present.
In person-centered communication, Hanka Grobler et al. explain the importance of
self-acceptance, "when an individual is able to symbolise most of her or his
experiences and integrate them into a total self concept, such individual will display
greater understanding of themselves ...". When clients experience acceptance from
a counsellor, they begin to accept themselves, which increases their self-esteem.
Low self-esteem is at the root of many problems because it erodes our confidence
in our ability to manage our lives.
The person-centered counsellor can engage in following behaviours to communicate
positive regard to the client:
1. Giving quality attention to the client's concerns and feelings.
2. Communicating a non-evaluative attitude towards client as a person worthy of
genuine care.
3. Responding to the client with empathy and understanding client's frame of
reference.
4. Reflecting to the client her or his potential and capabilities.
The relationship between client and counsellor is itself the vehicle for therapeutic
change. Genuine empathy, essential congruence and real acceptance will quite often
provide the means for clients to overcome encrusted habits, pain, divisive disordered 63
/ I
Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
64
thoughts and dysfunctional behaviours. Clients who experience their counsellors'
empathy and understanding, develop an increased self-acceptance and self-empathy,
which are powerful sources of personal growth in their own right. When clients
accept responsibility for their behaviour and emotions, they recognise that even in
the most difficult of circumstances, they have the ability to choose how they respond.
One of the principles underlying counselling is the desire to empower clients to take
responsibility for themselves and to identify, develop and use resources that will
make them more effective agents of change in the counselling sessions as well as
in their everyday lives. This is central to the reciprocal relationship that lies at the
heart of effective and reflective practice, and counsellors have the task of paying
attention to the client's expressed needs.
7.8 LIMITATIONS AND CRITICISM
Critiques of Rogers' person-centered counselling begin with his basic conception of
human nature as tending toward the good and the healthy. Another limitation of the
counselling is that the counsellors tend to be very supportive of clients without being
challenging.
Furthermore, critics of Rogers' theories maintain serious doubts that counsellors
can, or should, establish a relationship of unconditional positive regard in the case
of dangerously violent persons. They also fail to understand how parents might put
into practice her or his ideas when raising children whose behaviour may sometimes
be difficult to countenance with wholehearted approvaL At best, Rogers' detractors
claim, his ideas may be applied only among a limited range of clients, specifically
those suffering from the milder forms of neurosis. Despite such criticisms, Rogers'
theory of personality and his therapeutic methodology continue to gain adherents
and have become among the most widely influentialtrendsin the history of psychology.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space provided
below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. State 'True' or 'False':
i) Empathic understanding means perceiving the world; from the client's
perspective. _
ii) Gestures are not used to show attention. _
ill)A paraphrase is conscise response to the essence of the communication
in the counsellor's own words. _
iv) A congruent counsellor is non-defensive. _
7.9 LET US SUM UP
In this Unit, we studied that:
• A basic tenet of person-centered counselling is that people have worth and
dignity in their own right; therefore, they deserve respect. ./'
• According to person-centered beliefs, people have the potential for constructive
change and self-actualization.
Person-Centered
Counselling
• Person-centered counselling is considered a nondirective counselling because
of the counsellor's encouraging and listening role.
• The person-centered counsellor exhibits genuineness, unconditional positive
regard and empathy in dealings with clients.
• The predominant technique of the person-centered approach is communicating
empathy.
• The ultimate goal of person-centered counselling is to help a person realize her
or his potential for being a fully functioning human being.
7.10 GLOSSARY
Carl Rogers The father of person-centered counselling.
Rogers viewed people as good, rational, and
forward-moving beings.
Congruence A person-centered attitude of genuineness.
Rogers described this as being authentic or
"all in one piece".
Reflection
The person-centered attitude that holds
counselling together. Empathy is the
counsellor's ability to genuinely understand
the feelings and emotions of the client.
The process of letting the client know that
the counsellor truly hears and understands
what she or he is saying and feeling. This
can be accomplished through carefullistening
to the client's core message and responding
in such ways as paraphrasing and repeating
the client's feelings, thoughts, and concerns.
Empathy
Nondirective counselling
Unconditional positive regard
The first name for person-centered
counselling based on the counsellor's
listening and encouraging role.
A person-centered attitude of respect for
the client that is free of judgement.
7.11 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1. Incongruence is a discrepancy between the actual experience of the organism
and the self-picture of the individual insofar as it represents that experience.
2. Following are the three main phases in the development of person-centered
counselling:
65
/
/
Schools of Counselling and
Psychotherapy
66
i) Stage 1: Nondirective (1940-1950),
it) Stage 2: Client-centered (1950-1961), and
iii) Stage 3: Person-centered (1961-present).
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
1. Following are the major concepts of'person-centered counselling:
i) Actualizing tendency,
ii) Self-concept,
ill) Organisrnic valuing process, and
.iv) Need for positive regard.
2. According to Rogers. the fully functioning individual has following qualities:
i) Basic trust in self,
ii) Openness to experiences,
ill) Willingness to continuous growth, and
iv) Internal source of evaluation.
3. i) Congruence: Congruence means that the counsellors outward
responses match their inner awareness and feeling; that they are
genuine, real, open, authentic and transparent.
ii) Empathy : It is process of understanding another person as if you
were that person but without ever losing the 'as if' quality.
m) Unconditional positive regard: Unconditional positive regard on the
part of the counsellor means that the counsellor offers the person
respect, acceptance (it does not need to be approved), caring and
appreciation regardless of the client's attitude or behaviour.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1. i) True
it) False
iii) True
iv) True
7.12 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. ..What did Rogers see as the reason for negative and antisocial emotions?
2. What did Rogers say are the six conditions for personality change?
3. What are the three main attitudes or traits possessed by person-centered
counsellors?
4. What are the basic assumptions of Rogers' person-centered counselling?
Discuss.
/
/

5. Describe the nonverbal ways of communicating empathy.
6. Describe the stages ofRogerian counselling.
7. While watching a TV show, pay attention to the dialogue. Record several
conversational phrases and write empathic responses to as many statements as
possible.
8. Rogers believed that all humans move toward self-actualization. Consider your
own life. Do you feel you are moving toward self-actualization? If so, how?
If not, why not? Do you want to change this? Discuss with a partner.
Person-Centered
Counselling
7.13 FURTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES
Bergin & Garfield, S. L. (Eds.), Handbook of Psychotherapy And Behaviour
Change (4th ed.) New York: Wiley.
Bozarth, J. D. (1998). Person-Centered Therapy: A Revolutionary Paradigm.
United Kingdom: pces Books.
Ivey, A., Ivey, M. & Simek-Morganl, (1993). Counseling and Psychotherapy. A
Multicultural Perspective. Boston: Allyn & Bacon.
Rogers, C. R. (1951). Client-centered therapy Boston: Houghton Mifflin.
Rogers, C. R. (1980). A way of being. Boston: Houghton Mifflin.
See, J. D. (1986). A Person-Centered Perspective. New York: Springer.
67
I
/ I
UNIT 8 GROUP COUNSELLING AND
OTHER COUNSELLING
APPROACHES
Structure
8.1 Introduction
8.2 Group Counselling
8.2.1 Meaning of Groups
8.2.2 Types of Groups
8.2.3 Multi-Cultural Context
8.2.4 Ethical Issues
8.2.5 Characteristics for Group Leadership
8.2.6 Skills in a Group Leader I
8.2.7 Formation of a Group
18.3 TransactionalAnalysis
8.3.1 Basic Assumptions
8.3.2 Key Concepts
8.3.3 Goals of Therapy
8.3.4 The Therapeutic Procedure
8.3.5 Implementation of Therapy
8.3.6 Therapeutic Operations
8.3.7 Redecisional Approach
8.4 The Existential Approach to Counselling
8.4.1 Key Concepts
8.4.2 Application
8.5 Indian Psychotherapy and Counselling
8.6 Electic Approach to Counselling
8.7 Let Us Sum Up
8.8 Glossary
8.9 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
8.10 Unit End Questions
18.11 Further Readings and References
8.1 INTRODUCTION
68
We all are born in 'family' and become an integral part of 'our extended family,
community and society' upon birth. All these are forms of social groups in which
we are at times passive and at times active members. With the passage of time
children form groups to play with, peer groups are formed during adolescence,
also, we are always an active member in some kind of 'group' like neighbourhood,
tuition group, dance, sing, work, theatre group, etc.
Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Approaches
In this Unit, we are talking about groups formed for counselling and therapeutic
purposes which are mostly formed intentionally. Group counselling is an effective
method especially for counselling of parents of young school children, children
with disabilities, alcoholic groups etc. Groups counselling helps to learn that others
are also having similar problems, say in child rearing practice, problems associated
with children with disabilities and the knowledge that they are not the only one's
with this kind of situation or problem helps to develop internal resilience in people
to face different situations.
In this Unit, we will study in detail about group counselling, its principles and
applications, psychodrama, play therapy, transactional analysis, existential
psychotherapy and eclectic psychotherapy approach to counselling.
For this Unit, we have basically drawn from Corey's work on Theory and Practice
of Group Counselling and Patterson's work on Theories of Counselling and
Psychotherapy.
Objeectives
After studying the Unit, you will be able to:
• Delineate the general principles in group counselling;
• Understand the use of structured groups for therapeutic purposes;
• Develop in-depth knowledge and skills for group counselling and other
counselling approaches; and
• Apply the themes and concepts learnt about group counselling and other
counselling approaches in practical situations.
8.2 GROUP COUNSELLING
Groups that help make people change their feelings, thoughts, behaviour, construct
emotions affectively are the groups which have a therapeutic base and also at
times develop coping skills among its members.
Groups counselling is used in a variety of settings for therapeutic interventions.
For most of the theoretical approaches to counselling, groups counselling method
could also be used.
8.2.1 Meaning of Groups
Groups could be social in nature like family, school, peer, kin, etc. Groups can
be therapeutic in nature like people form a group intentionally to solve a problem.
The concept of 'Group' in psychotherapy was also used by Freud (1921) in his
book on 'Group counselling and the analysis of ego'. James Strachey (1949)
translated this work of Sigmund Freud. According to Freud, Group Psychology
is concerned with 'the individual man as a member of a race, of a nation, of a
caste, of a profession, of an institution, or as a component part of a crowd of
people who have been organized into a group at some particular time for some
definite purpose' (p-3). Freud draws from Le Bon's famous work Psychologies
69/
Schools of Counselling desjoules. Le Bon's work discussed here has been described in the translation.
'The Crowd: A study of the popular mind' by Fisher Unwin (1920). According
to Le Bon, the most striking peculiarity presented by a psychological group is that
whoever be the individuals that compose it, however like or unlike be their mode
of life, their occupations, their character, or their intelligence, the fact that they
have been transformed into a group puts them in possession of a sort of collective
mind which makes them feel, think and act in a manner quite different from that
in which each individual of them would feel, think and act were he or she in a state
of isolation. There are certain ideas and feelings which do not come into being,
or which do not transform themselves into acts except in the case of individuals
forming a group.
According to Le Bon, psychological group is a coalitionof heterogeneousindividuals
which are combined for a cause or purpose to work as a whole unified unit for
a given reason or cause.
Le Bon continues to explore the unity of an individual mind into the 'group'
collective mind and later discuss the role and function of a group leader. He
believed that morals of the groups are higher than that of individuals and 'that only
collectivities are capable of a high degree of unselfishness and devotion' (p.24).
McDougall (1920) in his work on 'The Group Mind' says, that 'group' possesses
no organization at all and describes a group as a 'crowd' (p. 26). But McDougall
believes that when human beings come together and the crowd fulfillsthe following
conditions, the disadvantage of group formation are removed. According to
McDougall, these conditions are:
1) The first and fundamental condition is that, there should be some degree of
continuity of existence in the group. This may be by the same individuals
remaining in the group for some time or in a group, a system of fixed
positions which are occupied by a succession of individuals is present.
2) The second condition is that, in the individual member of the group some
definite idea should be formed of the nature, composition, functions and
capacities of the group, so that the individual develops emotional relation to
the group as a whole.
3) The third condition is that, the group should be brought into interaction
(perhaps in the form of rivalry) with other groups similar to it but differing
from it in many respects.
4) The fourth condition is that the group should possess traditions, customs and
habits, especially those that determine the relations of its member to one
another.
5) The fifth and the last condition is that, the group should have a definite
structure, expressed in the specialization and differentiation of the functions
of its constituents (p. 30-31, Strachey).
70

b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Approaches
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
1. Write the meaning of psychological group according to Le Bon in your
own words.
2. Who described a group as 'crowd' a that fulfills certain conditions?
8.2.2 Types of Groups
Groups are groupings of individuals who come together for a given purpose or
cause. There could be various types of groups; some of which are:
• Religious group: Individuals belonging a particular sect or religion or prophet!
saint may form such groups
• Region group: Individuals from a particular race/region may form groups
• Caste group formed on these criteria
• Kin group
• Extended family group
• School tour group
• Tuition group
• Dance group
• Singing group
• Parent - Teacher group
• Traininggroups: Group formed for vocationaltraining,personalitydevelopment,
motivation training, say-No or assertion training etc.
71
/
I
Schools of Counselling
72
• Alcoholics group,
• Tobacco cessation group,
.• Drug deaddiction group,
• Children of drug abuse/alcoholics group,
• .Groups of parents of children with disabilities - such as mental retardation,
autism, learning disability, cerebral palsy etc.
Corey (1990) delineates the following types of groups to deal with problems
specific to that particular group:
i) Counselling groups for children: For reasons like emotional problems,
behaviour problems, educationalremedialreasons; group counselling at schools
is provided.
ii) Counselling for adolescents: This cO,:!ldbe provided for reasons like the
same as above and also for peer pressures, identity crisis, dependence/
independence struggles, acceptance/rejection conflicts, etc. According to
Corey, group counselling provides adolescents a place to express conflicting
feelings, communication with other and self, explore self doubts and realization
that they share similar concerns as their peers and, thereby, they can help
one another towards self-understanding and self-acceptance.
ill) Counselling groups for college students: These could be for the college
goers experiencing developmental crisis related to career decisions,
heterosexual relationship, identity problems, educational plans, isolation
feelings etc.
iv) Counselling groups for the "elderly:According to Corey, these groups are
as useful as for the adolescents. These groups would assist in strengthening
the elderly population and help them to live a meaningful life.
v) Group psychotherapy: These are the groups formed to help the individuals
through therapy. According to Corey, in group counselling emphasis is on
growth, development, enhancement, prevention, self-awareness and releasing
blocks to growth, while group therapy has emphasis on remediation, treatment
and personality reconstruction, He defines group psychotherapy as 'a process
of re-education that includes both conscious and unconscious awareness and
both the present and past' .
Both group counselling and group psychotherapy is based on one of the
theories or therapeutic models. Any of the Units studied earlier in this Block
can be used in group counselling. In this Unit, an attempt would be mode
to understand other theoretical/therapeutic perspectives which have not
been discussed earlier.
Remember that simply reading any therapeutic model does not qualify you
to start counselling in that direction. You should read a lot of literature
regarding the same. A list of suggested readings has been provided for
the same reason. Then you should carry out the initial counselling/therapy
sessions under supervision of the experienced professionals in this field.
For this, supervised practicum has been provided which needs to be
undertaken seriously.
/ 1
vi) Structured groups: Structured groups are the groups that have some central
or specific theme and are concerned with specific age group. For example,
Rose (1987) promoted the social competence of children in middle childhood
years through a time bound, structured small group.
vii) Self help groups: These are the groups of people with a common interest
to create a support system for themselves to protect them from psychological
stress and strain. Such groups help to modify people's life. You must be
aware of the women self help group who have formed a big business in India
- 'Lizzat papad'. Like this, self help groups are formed among say drug
abusers, alcoholics, tobacco users, parents of children with mental retardation
or autism, etc.
Group Counselliug aud
Other Counselling
Approaches
Both, self help groups and therapy groups emphasize expressing and sharing
emotions (Lakin, 1985). This is based on the presumption that people suffer
because of unexpressed emotions, feelings, thoughts, attitudes, behaviours, etc.
Further,selfhelp group's and therapy groups encourage, support,lead to behavioural
change, and lay emphasis on group's identity. Even though these groups seen
similar but Riordan and Beggs (1988) pointed out critical differences among the
two groups, such as in self help groups only a single topic is central issue like
addiction, cancer or obesity, whereas in therapy groups improving general mental
health or one's interpersonal functioning is the central theme (Riordan & Beggs,
1987). Lakin (1985) pointed out that self help groups emphasise inspiration,
persuasion and support while therapy groups use self-understanding, behavioural
reinforcement and member feedback. Also, the leadership used in both the groups
is different. Self help groups emphasise common identity or common life situation
of group members; here members accept and support each other. While therapy
group is like a real social environment of group members, a social microcosm
which acts as a catalyst for change in real social world (Corey, 1990). Both self
help group and therapy group are used in real life situations but the reason to
employ them are different and should be decided on the need of the person or
client.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. List down the groups you are aware of in your locality. Don't mention
the one's listed above.
73
1
Schools of Counselling 8.2.3 Multi-cultural Context
Group counselling in multi-cultural context should take the cultural background of
the group members and the group leader into consideration. Pedersen (1988)
defined multicultural counselling as two or more persons with different ways of
perceiving theirsocialenvironment attempt to work togetherin a helping relationship.
He defined 'race' as shared genetic history or psysical characteristics; 'ethnicity'
as shared socio-cultural heritage of a religion, history or common ancestry; and
'minority' as a group that has received differential and unequal treatment because
of collective discrimination. Further, he believed that culture always influences
person as well as counselling. It is important to remember that different cultures
may attach different or same importance to a specific behaviour. The importance
of a specific behaviour or attitude has to be understood from the patient or client's
perspective giving emphasis and importance to what is perceived in their culture
rather than the belief in the counsellor's society or culture. In group settings you
should be able to deal with the entire group as a whole and meet each individual
member's unique needs and differences. Therapist should not impose her or his
ideas on the group members nor consider one's own culture superior to others
or the group members. Corey emphasized that counsellor's genuine respect of
the difference among members of group and openness to learn from them will go
a long way in building the trust that is necessary for bridging differences between
the counsellor and the group.
Essential characteristics in group counsellor in multi-cultural context are discussed
below.
Characteristics to become a culturally effective group counsellor, according to
Sue (1978, 1981) are:
1. To recognize their own values and assumptions in contrast with alternative
assumptions,
2. To be aware of basic characteristics of counselling that cut across classes
and cultures,
3. To understand the socio-politicalforces that influence the attitudes of minorities
or oppressed groups,
4. To have the capacity to share a client's world view without.criticism or
judgement,
5. To develop their own eclectic or integrated approach to counselling so that
they are able to utilize various intervention models from various theoretical
orientations, and
6. To possess a range of beliefs, attitudes, ideas, and skills so as to develop
therapeutic relationship with diverse clients.
74
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. What do you understand by the term multi-cultural context?
8.2.4 Ethical Issues Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Group counselling or group therapy has to take into consideration the ethical Approaches
issues like in other counselling or psychotherapy or family therapy process; The
details of this have been discussed in detail in Course IV. Here, we will focus
on ethical issues and professional issues only in the light of group counselling.
Group members have a right to know the nature and purpose of the group before
joining it. Confidentiality of matters related to group members has to be observed.
The rules of the group and the procedure that would be employed in group
counselling has to be clearly outlined to the group members. Rights and
responsibilities of the group members have to be decided and the members
clearly told when they can break the confidentiality clause. Group leader (the
counsellor) needs to tell about oneself to the group and one's rights and
responsibilities. The responsibility of group members includes being regular,
divulging personal information to the group and giving their opinion or feedback
to group members. The members have the freedom to leave the group, give their
opinion or feedback to group counselling any time they wish. No group member
or leader should impose their values on other group members and be given equal
respect irrespective of social-cultural backgrounds.
8.2.5 Characteristics for Group Leadership
When assuming the role of group counselling one becomes the group leader. Our
own personality influences our role as group leader. Corey identified the following
characteristics that influence group leadership:
1. Emotional presence: Group leader should be emotionally present in the
group should be moved by the joy and pain of the group members. It means
"to be their" or "being their" with the group members and it involves genuine
caring and willingness to enter their psychological world.
2. Personal power: Personal power involves self-confidence and an awareness
of one's influence on others. It means not to dominate or bully but to be
able to influence others to use their unused power. This can be done by
those leaders who feel they posses the power in their own lives.
3. Courage: They have to exhibit courage in their interactions with the group
and not sit in the role of counsellor. It means to be able tobe 'real' person,
that is, be able to admit mistakes, be vulnerable at times, act by intuition and
beliefs.
4. Willingness to confront oneself: Self confrontation with questions like
why I am a group leader, why do I behave as I do in groups, what needs
of mine are being served by being a group leader, etc. is important These
questions have no simple answers but confronting these questions would help
to make you honest about your motivations for being a group leader.
S. Sincerity and authenticity: Group leader should have sincere interest in
the wellbeing and growth of others. She or he has to be honest and direct
in telling the group members to look into parts of their life which they are
denying. Sincere group leader is mostly authentic. She or he does not hide
behind facades but has the determination to stand firm and share feelings
with the group and of the group.
75
Schools of Counselling 6. Senseofidentity: She or he should have a clear sense of identity; then only
they would be able to help group members discover themselves.
7. Beliefin group process and enthusiasm: She or he should have firm
belief in the group process to make the group a success. Also, she or he
should be enthusiastic to be a group leader firm conviction to bring about
change.
8. Inventivenessand creativity: Spontaneous creativity and approaching the
group with new ideas is a great potential of a good group leader.
Do remember that a group counsellor initially may have some anxiety to face the
group and make the group a great success. They may be anxious regarding how
much self-disclosure should be done by them and interjections allowed when the
disclosure is made. In a group some members may resist you or other members
in the group. Groupcounsellor is expected to deal with such situations effectively
by telling them rules of acceptance, dignity and equal respect for all members.
There could be some members who are unwilling to disclose or share or express
themselves. In such cases, they should be given freedom to join in when they
want.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. List down the characteristics of a good group leader .
...
Now, we need to understand the skills required for being a group leader .
•
8.2.6 Skills in .a Group Leader
Like any skill, leadership skills also have to be learnt. Corey enumerated the
following group leadership skills:
1. Activelistening: It means giving total attention to the speaker and being
sensitive to what is being communicated at both verbal and non-verbal levels.
It also involves understanding unsaid messages.
2. Restating: It means repeating what the speaker said in different words so
that meaning is clear to both speaker and the group. It is to clarify what has
been said.
3. Clarifying: It means clarifying confusing and unclear thoughts and aspects
of statements in a message by focussing on underlying issues and helping the
person sort out conflicting feelings. This helps to sort out thoughts.
76

4. Summarizing: It means putting togetherimportant elements of a group session.
It helps in moving from one topic to another and linking the tow topics.
5. Questioning: It means using appropriate questions to ask or involve group
members in a session. Closed questions having answers of 'yes' or 'no'
should be avoided as far as possible.
6. Interpreting: It means interpretation of participant's behaviour, feelings,
thoughts, emotions or experiences. It helps to give perspective, alternative,
and insight to the individuals.
7. Confronting: It means challenging the members to take an honest look at
themselves. It helps involve even the reluctant group members.
Reflecting feelings: It is a' skill of responding to the essence of what a
person has communicated. This informs the members that they have been
heard and understood.
8.
9. Supporting: It means giving members encouragement, reinforcement, and
support especially when they are disclosing personal information or personal
expenences.
10. Empathizing: It means that the group leader is able to have empathy or
sensitivity towards the group experiences and at the same time is able to
maintain her or his separateness or individuality.
11. Facilitating: It means toehhance group experience and help them reach
their goals.
12. Initiating: It means to bring the group's attention to the central theme or
issue to be discussed.
13. Goal setting: It means helping the members to set their goals and re-set the
same with the passage of time.
14. Evaluating: It means assessment of the group process, group members and
also individual members; meaning evaluating the group as a whole as well as
the individuals comprising it.
15. Giving feedback: It means to give honest and clear feedback to the group
members and also obtaining clear and honest feedback from the group.
16. Suggesting: It helps the participants to develop an alternative way of thinking
or doing.
17. Protecting: It means to protect the members from psychological and/or
physical risk associated with being members of a group. Individual members'
psychological needs have to be taken care of.
18. Disclosing oneself: It means that the leader reveals personal information
about oneself to the group. She or he has to decide how much to disclose,
what to tell and when to tell.
19. Modeling: It means being a role model to the group. To foster qualities in
the group, the leader has to demonstrate the same first to the group.
Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Approaches
77

Schools of Counselling
78
20. Linking: It means to develop linkages or communications at member-tomember level and among all members to foster more connectedness and to
bring about change.
21. Blocking: It means to stop counterproductive behaviours within the group.
Group pressure, gossiping, making fun of one member, etc. needs to be
stopped.
22. Terminating: It means leaders should know how to terminate or close the
group. They should give suggestions to the group to effectively use the
knowledge gained in the group in their practical daily life.
J
.....................................•.....................................................................
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. Write short notes on the following:
a) Modeling:
I
.••.... 'i\"\" .
b) Eval.g:
..........................................................................................................
c) Interpreting:
8.2.7 Formation of a Group
When a group is formed it should be made clear to the group members what the
objectives of the group are. Expectations of each group member should be clear..
All should have a freedom to express their thoughts and feelings, Members during
the group meetings should be frequently asked if they are facing any problems in
the group meetings or in doing the homework assignments. If there are any
doubts or misconceptions, those should be clarified. All group meetings should
close after inquiring if the members have any doubts or want to ask or clarify
anything. And, when the group has to terminate it should sum up all the sessions
and suggestions to implement the ideas learnt in the group in real life settings
should be provided. Screening of group members for a particular group needs
to take into consideration the expectation of the member and purpose of the

group. Individual interview of the member at times helps to decide whether she
or he should participate in the group. Fees charged has to be told at the start
of the group formation. Preferably time limit of a sessions, total number of
sessions, frequency and duration, time, day and dates should be clarified at the
outset of the group formation. If you have a eo-leader in the group then you
should have a clear idea about each person's role and both share equal responsibility
in the group. Both of you should be attuned with each other, share a deeper
understanding to make the group work a success.
Corey gave the following stages in the development of a group:
Stage 1: Initial Stage - Orientation and Exploration
During initial stage one has to orient towards the goal of the group and explore
the expectations of the group members. Now, goals have to be defined, initial
personal anxiety and concerns have to be converted into open expression in
group meetings. Members have to identify with the group and 'be one' or
included in the group. It takes some time on part of the members to be integrated
within the group.
Stage 2: Transition Stage - Dealing with Resistance
During transition stage, the group leader helps the members to identify and deal
with their anxiety, resistance and conflict. It leads to openness and trust in the
group members and revelations on the part of the members. Conflicts and
negativefeelings also occur now. These need to be dealt with. Remaining aloof'
or quitting or being afraid of being observed would not help group members.
Criticism also may happen at times and may lead to challenging the group leader.
Her or his feelings may at times be hurt. There could be resistance or avoidance
on other or self exploring personal issues which hurt. For the group to be effective,
creating a supportive environment is important.
Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Approaches
Stage 3: Working Stage - Cohesion and Productivity
During this stage exploration of significant problems is done. Now, the group
senses a closeness or cohesion among its members; they identify with each other's
problems and a sense of belongingness, inclusion and solidarity emerges. All
members feel being part of the group. They develop trust in each other and
accept each other as they are, which leads to sharing their inner self-thoughts and
. .
feelings with the group members. Understanding each others' feelings and emotions
leads to both having empathy and caring for the other person. Hope emerges in
the members. The confidence and motivation to do group work and commitment
towards the goals of the group acts as a therapeutic act in itself. Members have
now the freedom.to experiment and decide what and which behaviour they want
to change. They have to then have commitment to change in the group first and
later when the grolfP terminates. Intimacy develops among the group members as
they find others similar to themselves and identify with each other. Emotional
release or catharsis takes place. People fmd a vent to their feelings when sharing
it with others at an interpersonal leveL And, this helps in accepting and giving a
new meaning to the experience. This leads to cognitive restructuring of the
existent beliefs or issues or situations. New meaning is added in the light of
catharsis. Self-disclosure helps in open communication within the group..It leads
to interaction and discussion in the group. Here, sometimes confrontation of the
group members is done. It may help to provide an insight or accurate understanding
of a given problem or issue. Feedback is given to the members, exchanged 79

Schools of Counselling between members and received from the members. It helps the members to feel
confident that they can change if they want to.
Stage 4: Final Stage - Consolidation and Termination
During this stage, all the issues or topics discussed during the meetings are
consolidated. Members should be aware of the termination of the group from the
beginning of the group. Integrating and interpreting of the group experience is
now done by the group members and then summarized by the group leader.
Before the last session comes near, the leader should inform the group that it
would be terminated in a few sessions time. This helps preparing the group for
the end of the group meetings. The use of the learnt group experiences in the real
life settings should be emphasized.
Follow-up and Evaluation
After the group has been terminated, a follow up session should be planned with
the group by deciding the day, date and timing with the group. This would give
the members a chance to come together again. The leader can assess the impact
of the therapy on the members and also all could have a realistic picture of the
impact of these sessions on themselves and their group members. Corey advices
that individual follow-up sessions should also be organised to understand the
changes in the member and to show the member the personal concern of the
leader.
A word of caution is important in this context. Expertise in individual counselling
and psychotherapy does not automatically make you an expert in group counselling
and psychotherapy also. One has to have thorough knowledge and understanding
to apply the principles of group counselling in practice. Initially, one should work
under supervision. After practice start independent group counselling.
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. What are the four stages 9f group formation?
8.3 TRANSACTIONAL ANALYSIS
80
Transactional analysis was developed by Eric Lennard Berne (1910-1970). Berne
was a psychiatrist and also trained as psychoanalyst. He deviated from
psychoanalysis as it took along time to cure the patients. His work is more on
groups though he used this approach for individual therapy also. In this section,
we would try to understand the basic concepts and principles of this approach
to counselling.

8.3.1 Basic Assumptions Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
There are a few basic assumptions of Transactional Analysis (TA). According Approaches
this approach, proprounded by Berne, each individual has the capacity to develop
to her or his potential to the bestadvantage of herself or himself and society, to
enjoy herself or himself and to be able to work productively and creatively, and
to be free of psychological disabilities.One of the basic assumptions in transactional
analysis is that awareness leads to change in our thinking or behaving. Another
assumption is that each of us is responsible for our thoughts, actions and feelings.
Individuals or clients need to take charge or responsibility for changing themselves.
They should not blame others for their misgivings in life; instead, should take
responsibility on self and thereby be able to change the circumstances. They need
to understand their past actions and decisions and its impact on the present and
be able to change their present to Improve their future.
8.3.2 Key Concepts
Let us now discuss in detail the key concepts of Berne's theory. Transactional
analysis is basically based on the belief that the decisions we take in present are
rooted in our past survival needs which may no longer be relevant in the present
times.
1. The Ego States or the Personality Structure
Berne formulated three ego states which constitutes our personality structure.
These three ego states are: the Parent, the Adult and the Child ego state.
It is presumed in this theory that the person shifts among these three ego
states.
The Parent Ego State
The parent ego state (P) consists of the attitudes and behaviour incorporated
from external sources, primarily one's parents (Corey) or those whom the
person considered parent substitutes. This parental influence on the person
is direct which has an impact on the attitudes, behaviours, gestures, postures,
communication patterns, etc. of the person. Its one aspect is also Freud's
superego. Parent ego state is not present in only abstract forms; it is more
direct; for example, it can be said that one behaves like one's father. It is
derived from exteropsyche, involving identification activities .
•
The parent ego state has the role of being nurturant, give encouragement,
prohibit, command, be critical, etc. It contains the rules of living and
following our parents' footsteps in the same situations. Parent ego state
also takes decisions as parents would take for their child.
The Adult Ego State
The adult ego state (A) is the part which can process information and take
decisions in a realistic way. It also acts as mediator between the parent ego
state and the child ego state.
The Child Ego State
The child ego state (C) is mainly the emotions, feelings and impulse desires.
Here, the child ego is not equal to Freud's id, though id can influence the
child ego. According to Berne, the child could be a natural child who is
81

Schools of Counselling
82
impulsive, spontaneous, open, alive, charming but untrained; an adapted
child who has adapted or whose behaviour has been modified or inhibited
by the parents; or the rebellious child who rebels or resists the parental
authority.
Parent ® ethical guide
Adult 0 realistic
Child CS) archaic tendency
Fig. 8.1: Diagrammatic representation of ego states
Fig, 8.1 is a diagrammatic representation of the parent, adult and child
ego states - all have equal space and respect in an individual's life.
These three ego states form the personality structure in Berne's theory
of transactional analysis.
Personality Function
The parent ego state has a role to enforce standards or norms of the
society. The adult ego state processes and stores the information
received. The child ego state contains impulses and desires. When a
stimuli is present, all these ego states perceives it, and interact among
themselves to react to it. Psychic energy or cathaxis flows from one
ego state to another and the state that is cathected at a particular time
has executive power, which determines the individual's behaviour at that
time. The active state is cathected with unbourd energy; the inactive
state is said to be cathected with bound energy and the energy which
moves freely from one ego state to another is free cathaxis and the
feeling of 'Self' resides in the ego state in which free cathaxis is present.
The executive ego state generally has both the unbound energy and free
cathaxis (Patterson, 1986).
These ego states have boundaries and they don't overlap each other
but in various situations or problems their placement may be changed.
For example, in an alcoholic the parent ego state is the weakest while
child ego state is strongest and they replace each other's position
(Patterson) .
2. Strokes
Transactional analysis theory presumes that individuals need both physical
and psychological strokes to live happily in the society. These strokes
lead to formulation of trust in the world and acceptance of their worth
and loving themselves. Steiner (1974) said that strokes are as necessary
to human life as are other primary biological needs such as food, water
and shelter needs which if not satisfied will lead to death. Strokes can
be positive or negative and both these have an impact on the
psychological well being of an individual. Positive strokes have a positive
impact on the psyche. Positive strokes are warmth, affection, appreciation,
acceptance, etc. These may be expressed verbally or non-verbally -
like through facial expressions, smile, eye contact, touch, gesture etc.
Negative strokes have a negative influence on one's psyche. These are
considered to be preferred than no stroke at all. For example, attention
1
seeking behaviour of a child who prefers being scolded by the parent
rather than being ignored.
Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Approaches
Positive strokes are either given unconditionally or conditionally.
Unconditional positive stroke leads to the feeling of being important just
because one exists, it has no role with the individual's behaviour or role.
On the other hand, conditional positive stroke is given when one does
the activity or role as one is expected to do. In transactional analysis,
group members are taught to recognize strokes that motivate them, they
are sensitive to and also change the perception of the strokes received
by the individuals.
3. Injunctionsand Counterinjunctions
Injunctions are parental inessages that arise from the parent's child ego
state. These messages are primarily "Don'ts" - expressed by
disappointment, frustration, anxiety, unhappiness, etc. These "don'ts" are
learnt during childhood.
"Don't", "Don't be", "Don't be close"', "Don't be separate from me",
"Don't want", "Don't need", "Don't succeed", "Don't be you", "Don't
be same", "Don't be well", "Don't belong", etc. (M. Goulding, 1987;
M. Goulding & R. Goulding, 1979).
M. Goulding (1987) states that children decide whether to accept these
parental messages or to fight against them. And, if they decide to accept
them, they would further decide precisely how they will accept them.
Acceptance of some injunctions leads to decisions made by children
which further defines their permanent character.
Counterinjunctions are the counterpart of injunctions. These are the
parental messages that come from the parent's parent ego state. These
contain messages that should be done primarily. These consists of 'dos',
'shoulds', 'oughts', of parental expectations - like, 'Be tough', 'Be
perfect', 'Work up to your potential', 'Do what I expect of you', 'Hurry
up', 'Try hard', 'Please me', 'Be careful', 'Be polite', etc. (Corey).
These counterinjunctions cannot be achieved in totality. Hence it leads
to unsatisfaction and frustration of not having done to their maximum
expectation. Transactional analysis helps people to evaluate their internalized
'dos' and 'don'ts' and later help them critically examine whether they
want to continue living with them or not.
4. Decisions and Redecisions
As discussed above, injunctions and counterinjunctions received from the
parents largely determine the individual's present decisions. Transactional
analysis provides an understanding based on cognitive, rational and/or
behavioural aspects to become aware of our decisions and the capacity
to take redecisions new decisions which lead to and better psychological
well being. Berne (1964, 1972) said that people are victims of their
injunctions and of the decisions based on them. He said that how people
are scripted by their parents in the long run determines their life plans.
Though Goulding and Goulding (1976) do not agree on this with Berne,
they believe that each child makes decisions in response to real or
83
I
Schools of Counselling imagined injunctions and thereby scripts herself or himself. The Gouldings
said that many injunctions children live under are not issued by parents
but instead are from the children's own fantasy and misinterpretations.
They also say that both injunctions and counterinjunctions represent
parental authority, but the child has to accept them to have any impact
on self.
Here, the client is made to relive the decisions taken during childhood.
And, later the client would add fantasy to it and in some way reject
the old decision and take a redecision. Here the clients discard their
child decisions, critical parent and develop their own self-nurturing which
, leads to their being more happy and psychologically healthy individuals
and develop a new entity or self for themselves in the world.
5. Social Intercourse
Transaction is the primary unit of social intercourse. A transactional
stimulus is initiated by the person who initiates the transaction and when
the other person responds a transactional response occurs.
Transaction occurs in series which could be through material programming,
social programming and individual programming. Material programming
is through activities or procedures that deal with material external reality.
Social programming is through activities during social interaction, rituals,
pastimes and games. Rituals are socially prescribed forms of behaviour
in standard social situations, like greeting on meeting others; 'Hello/
Goodbye'. These are generally stereotyped and predictable. Pastimes
are less restricted. They begin and end with rituals but facilitate more
social interaction with others and give the person a role to play.
6.· Games
Games are more serious 'that both rituals and pastimes. Games play a
number of functions and fill or occupy most of the individual's social
life. While pastimes could be boring, games are exciting and provide
strokes or social reinforcement. Repetition of game leads to collection
of a particular feeling or of ',trading stamps' . Dynamic function of games
is to preserve psychic equilibrium of a person. Frustration during a game
leads to rage or despair. Feelings of guilt, inadequacy, hurt, fear,
resentment, anger, worthlessness, unhappiness may at times be resultant
of games. These are the trading stamps. Self indulgence in these negative
feelings is called racket. Berne believed that procedures, rituals, pastimes
are directly taught by parents while games are taught indirectly and are
learnt through imitation. In games one person has bad or negative feelings
in the end. Games prevent intimacy and lead to social withdrawal.
7. Intimacy
Intimacy is a part of individual programming. It is the ideal human living
and should provide safety and happiness. To develop intimacy, the person
has to let go games, rituals and procedures learnt and negative influence
of family and parents.
84
/

8. Life Positions Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
During early childhood period, one takes a decision about oneself, the Approaches
world and relate to others. Such decisions have been called life positions
and they develop into life scripts. Once a life position has been decided
upon by the individual, individuals do not change unless intervention or
therapy is provided to change. According to transactional analysis, there
are four basic life positions based on childhood experiences, which help
to know how the person relates to themselves and to the outside world
or others. These life positions are:
1) I am OK - You are OK.
2) I am OK - You are not OK.
3) I am not OK - You are OK.
4) I am not OK - You are not OK.
'I' and 'You' (others) and 'OK' and not 'OK' are two polars in these
statements. 'I' may at times be 'We' and 'You' be 'They'. 'OK' may
be good traits and 'not OK' any bad traits in others or groups.
I am OK - You are OK : It is characterized by trust, openness,
acceptance of others as they are. It is game free.
I am OK - You are not OK : It is 'characterized by a sense of
superiority complex in self. Here one may feel disgust, anger, criticism,
etc. at others.
I am not OK - You are OK : It is characterized by inferiority feeling.
They feel powerless, marginalized, victimized, do only for others.
I am not OK - You are not OK : It is characterized among those
who have lost all hope and interest from life. They may be withdrawn,
self destructive.
9. Life Scripts
Berne said that during childhood interactions with parents and others
based on the strokes received by them which may be supporting strokes
or disparaging strokes, one forms life scripts. The earliest transaction
in script is called the protocol and derives from experiences with and
the influence of parents. It is later influenced by the myths and fairy
tales heard by the child. In later years it is repressed but reappears
in the preconscious as the script proper. The script proper is modified
as a compromise with reality and becomes the adaptation. All these
three together - protocol, script proper and adaptation - constitute the
term script (Patterson). Script decides how a person would live, role
play in real life. Script refers to the childhood decisions taken by
individuals and at times needs to be changed.
One of the major function during. transaction analysis is the script
analysis, so as to know how these scripts were formed during the life
course. It also helps them to change their life positions and develop
the ideal life position - I am OK - You are OK.
85
Schools of Counselling
Check Your Progress Exercise 7
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. Give diagrammatic p~esentation of the personality structure according to
Berne.
2. What do you understand by the term 'strokes'.
8.3.3 Goals of Therapy
The goal of transactional analysis therapy is to do structural readjustment and
reintegration of self. It believes in total transformation of an individual.
8.3.4 The Therapeutic Procedure
Contracts
86
The transactional analysis is preceded by an agreement or a contract by the
participants or patients, where in, it is explicitly written what one desires or wants
from the therapy and therapist also writes what she or he can offer. The contract
is amended as the therapy proceeds. Contract is a practical tool to bring out
change and also assess how much change is happening.
Structural Analysis.
Structural analysis involves understanding the three ego states. Here redefining the
ego boundaries and the adult takes place. The clients are first helped to identify
their own ego states and later change the ego state that is causing problem. Berne
(1961) described two types of problems that need to be considered in structural
analysis: exclusion and contamination. Exclusion is excluding one ego state
completely by another ego state; it consists of rigid ego state boundaries which
do not permit free movements. There are three forms of exclusion: the Constant
Parent, the Constant Adult and the Constant Child, signifying that the person
relates primarily to the parent, adult or child, respectively. The constant parent
would exclude adult and child ego states; and similarly the constant adult would
1
exclude parent and child ego states while the constant child would exclude the
parent and adult ego states. The constant parent persons are found to be duty
bound or work alcholics. The constant adult type are found to be very objective,
concerned with only facts. The constant child type persons are the ones who do
not face the reality or refuse to grow up.
Contamination is overlapping of one ego state on another leading to intermixing
of two states. Adult can be intermixed by the parent or child ego states and then
behaviour is influenced accordingly.
Transactional Analysis
Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Approaches
Even though the theory is named as transactional analysis one of the major
therapeutic process is also called transactional analysis. It involves the description
of what people do and say to one another. According to Berne there are three
types of transactions, these are: complementary transactions, crossed transactions
and ulterior transactions. Complementary transactions are those in which specific
state of one person gets predicted response from the specific ego state of another
person. Crossed transactions are unexpected response received from the ego
state of another person. Ulterior transactions are more complex and involve
more than two ego states and a disguised message during the interaction of two
persons. Group is important for transactional analysis.
Analysis of Pastimes and Games
Analysis of pastimes is part of the initial phase of group therapy. Games are
evaluated in the therapy process. Berne stressed the importance of learning to
understand why and how games take place and how people are kept apart
because of these games. The individual games are evaluated in terms of primary
gains (external and internal), secondary gains, social gains ami biological gains
(the removal of isolation by stimulation). The game analysis provides freedom
from games in intimate relationships and in society (Patterson).
Life Script Analysis
Life script analysis involves identifying the life pattern on which the person bases
the life script. This aims to help individuals to change their lives by redefining
actions. It portrays the actions and strategies employed by the individuals. They
replay their childhood memories and now as adults understand the-injunctions and
counterinjunctions learnt during the childhood period. Various techniques are
employed to understand the family. It could be through giving group members a
role to play in the family play. It could be through didactic procedures like
Karpman Drama Triangle in which members identify scripts and games. The
triangle has a 'Persecutor', a 'Rescuer', and a 'Victim'. It is based on Karpman's
(1968) work. Persecutor criticizes other (victim), rescuer saves the victim and
victim is helpless and passive member. Steiner (1967) developed a life-script
questionnaire to help group members explore their life positions, roles and games.
This is another method of script analysis.
Analysis of Relationships
This is done in marital relationships or other intimate relationships. It should be
done with a lot of care and caution as patients would take it as personal influence
on their decisions.
87
Schools of Counselling 8.3.5 Implementation of Therapy
Patterson (1986) writes that Berne has three injunctions for the therapist and
these are:
1. The therapist should do no harm. Intervention should be made when necessary
and to the extent necessary.
2. All organisms have built-in drive to normal health and the therapist's role is
to remove the blocks to natural healing and growth.
3. The therapist treats the patient but God does cure the patient. It is therapist's
who gives the best possible treatment but it is the nature or God who does
the healing.
Further, Berne gave some hints for the beginning therapist Patters on enumerate
them as follows:
1. First learn to differentiate the adult from the child, the parent ego state would
become clear later.
2. You should wait until the patient has provided at least three examples or
diagnostic illustrationsbefore introducingthe system's concept that is applicable
to him/her.
3. Later diagnosis of the parent or the child ego state must be confirmed by
actual historical material provided by the patient.
6. The child ego state is not childish but child like and possesses potentially
valuable qualities.
7. The person must recall its experience of the child ego state. It is not simply
recalling its experiences (regression analysis) but also experiencing the pain
and anxeiety of those memories.
4. Realize that the three ego states are to be taken literally, as though the patient
were three people. The therapist must also recognize her or his own three
ego states and their influence on the therapy.
5. Every patient is assumed to have an adult ego state; the problem arises in
cathecting it.
8. Pastimes and games are not habits, attitudes or occasional occurrences; they
constitute most of the patient's activities.
9. "The ideal intervention is the 'bull's eye', one which is meaningful and
acceptable to all three aspects of the patient's personality, since all three
overhear what is said". It is recognized by all three ego states.
10. The beginner is likely to experience a negative reaction towards the
terminology, but this is an expected part of learning a new system of therapy.
Therapist should be a keen observer and should use all her or his senses.
88
8.3.6 Therapeutic Operations Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Berne considers eight categories of basic techniques of transactional analysis, Approaches
which is a group treatment. These are as follows:
Regression analysis
Interrogation should be done when therapist is sure
that the patient's adult will respond and only the
information required should be asked.
Specification means reiterating to the patient by the
therapist regarding what has been elicited by the
patient.
The therapist during confrontation would use
prev.iouslyobtained information from the patient and
say it at a point of inconsistency in the patient's
thought. Its purpose is to cathect the uncontaminated
part of the patient's adult.
Explanation is done to strengthen the patient's adult.
Explanations should be concise and should be used
if the patient is not facing the facts by self.
illustration is usually followed after confrontation to
lessen the impact of undesirable effects of
confrontation. It is used when both adult and child
are listening.
Confirmation is to be used only if previous
confrontation and illustration were successful and
the patient's adult has become strong.
If the above techniques have been useful in
successfully cathecting and decontaminating the
patient's adult, and the adult is now strong, and
can understand self and be ready for of the therapy
termination can take place.
Transactionalanalysisis completed by crystallization
even if interpretation is not done. It happens when
the adult of therapist is able to interact with the
adult of patient. To cure the patients, therapist may
at times also use its parent or child ego states, but
remember, therapist does not play roles.
Regression analysis is used in addition to the eight
techniques mentioned above. It means the child
ego state has to be heard in the presence of both
adult and parent ego states and later the analysis is
done with the patient.
Interrogation
Specification
Confrontation
Explanation
Illustration
Confinnation
Interpretation
Crystallization
8.3.7 Redecisional Approach
The Gouldings gave a redecisional approach to therapy which has some contrast
with the classical Berne transactional analysis approach. According to them, the
client has to make redecisions while they are in the child ego state. This can
happen when the client enters into the child ego state and takes a decision to
change; understanding of the problem from adult ego state does not help. 89
Schools of Counselling The Initial Stage of the Group
In this approach, establishment of good rapport with the leader and members is
important. The members initially may not bring forth their main concerns and
would avoid important issues. Trust has to be established and later inquiry of their
problems would lead to accurate answers. The client has to take action by
responding and then contract has to be formulated.
The Working Stage of the Group
After contract has been formulated, racket is explored - of bad intentions and
feelings while games are played, actions used to justify wrong acts and decisions
taken for the same. The person is taken from the present feelings to the past
childhood days from where the decisions were taken. Then games are analysed
and challenges placed if the client is not taking responsibility. Then the client can
take redecisions when they learn and understand that they had taken early decisions
and so they can now change or take redecisions. This kind of therapy according
to the Gouldings will not take a long time in analysis.
The Final Stages of the Group
Once redecision in the child ego state is made then change in the body, voice,
gestures are explicit to all group members. Reinforcement of this decision by the
client and other group members is important.
Group members have to tell new story to replace old story and now group.
members would receive both verbal and non-verbal strokes for their decisions.
The ways in which members would devise support systems outside the group
would be found. They need to fantasize the change, new problems and new
successes during the final stage and before termination. This would help the client
to settle down in later life more effectively.
90
Check Your Progress Exercise 8
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. What is the difference between Gouldings' and Berne's perspective in
transactional analysis? •
...............................................................................................................
\
/

8.4 THE EXISTENTIAL APPROACH TO
COUNSELLING
Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Approaches
The existential approach to counselling is based on the "third force" or philosophical
approach. For existential psychotherapy the main concerns are: freedom, isolation,
death and meaninglessness - the roots of human existence (Yalom, 1980).
Existentialismtriesto understand client's subjective view of the world.This approach
peeps into the lives of the clients as well as therapist as perceived and experienced
by the client. This approach helps the client to understand that they are not living
a full meaningful life as they would have desired to live and to bring about the
desired changes in the selves - take the right choices that will help them to live
a life they are capable of being.' The key existential writers were Heidegger and
Sartre, who did not write from therapy view point directly but tried to understand
the human experiences deeply. Existential therapy may also be used in group
situations.
8.4.1 Key Concepts
'-----
The key concepts of this approach are: self awareness, self-determination,
responsibility, existential anxiety, death and non-being, the search for meaning, the
search for authenticity, aloneness/relatedness. Let us briefly discuss each of these
key concepts.
Self-awareness
Self-awareness helps to differentiate between other organisms and develop an
understanding of our freedom to choose and to act upon. This freedom to choose
helps us to understand that whether we have to be passive or active in determining
a route for ourselves. Self-awareness gives direction or meaning to our existencewhether we decide for ourselves or others will decide for us. Either we develop
an identity for ourselves or let it be lost to conformity to others. Whether we want
to do our maximum potential or do little of our capacity. Whether we are prepared
for the anxiety to take self decisions or we want to depend on others. To find a
meaning of our life or lead an empty and meaningless existence. To accept the
inevitability of our eventual death or escape from this reality as it makes you
anxious. These are some of the options that self-awareness leads one to recognize
(Corey).
Self-Determination and Personal Responsibility
Existential approach believes that we are free to choose, determine among which
alternative to choose, direct our life and shape our destiny. Sarte (1971) points
out that we are free to choose but we have to constantly choose the kind of
person we want to be and with time, the choices needs to be changed. Russell
(1978) further said that each time we act, we choose and create ourselves as we
want to be and this process never ends and it impacts all the deeds one does.
Frankl (1963) said that, "Life ultimately means taking responsibility to find the
right answer to its problems and to fulfill the tasks which it constantly sets for each
individual". According to Frankl, clients should accept their role in creating their
distress and after acceptance only they can change. The others or the environment
does not change, one has to change.
91
1
Schools of Counselling Existential Anxiety
According to this approach, anxiety is the main characteristic of human life. It also
acts as a motivation to do something. Anxiety is a result of our choices without
knowing the outcome. Kierkegaord said "existential anxiety is the dizziness of
freedom". Anxiety results because we have to leave our familiar ways and choose
the unknown new ways to do things. May (1983) said that "anxiety isthe experience
of the threat of imminent nonbeing". Existential anxiety is the result of 'change' or
'want' to become what we are capable of. It helps us to take action for growth.
If we remove or blunt existential anxiety, then we have constricted our lives and
limited our choices (Corey).
Death and Non-being
According to the existentialist, life has meaning because it will end, death gives
purpose to life and gives significance to the present hour and the present hour is
what we really have to live. The reality that one day I would die is the most
important thing and this realization brings anxiety. Frankl said it is not important
how long we live, but how we live determines the quality and meaningfulness of
our life.
The Search of Meaning
The search of meaning refers to search of answers to questions like - 'Who am
I?', 'Why am I here?', 'Where am I going?', 'Why am I going?', 'What is the
purpose of life?', 'Why am I living?'. These questions become essential to
existentialist viewpoints. It is 'I' who has to give meaning to life and to create it
through a positive reasoning. Frankl said that we can create meaning through
various ways like - work, love, doing things to alleviate other's suffering. He said
that the therapist should not tell the client what is the meaning of life for her or
him but encourage them to find it for themselves. He further stated stated that our
suffering, pain, despair can be turned into achievement by the stand we take in
the face of it.
The Search for Authenticity
Authenticity is the 'courage to be' (Paul Tillich, 1952) to live from inside.
Discovering, creating and maintaining the core deep within our being is a difficult
,
and never-ending struggle (Corey). Keen (1970) said that authentic being is born
of anxiety, the anxiety of never knowing if are making the right choices and having
the courage to do so. Frankl says that it is the therapist's role to challenge the
clients to become their full and authentic selves and make life commitments.
Inauthenticity leads to existential guilt, which means a sense of incompleteness and
the realization that we are not utilizing our full potentials (Corey). Authenticity or
leading a life to our maximum ability leads to self actualizing. Maslow (1970) said
that self-actualization is the tendency to become all that we are able to become.
Self-actualizing person according to Maslow has a sense of inner direction, resists
being led by others, has tolerance, caring, acceptance, committed intimate
relationships, autonomy and perceives others and the world with spontaneity and
naturalness.
Aloneness and Relatedness
92
Existential approach believes that ultimately we all are alone and have to find
meaning to our beingllife/existence by realization of being alone. Aloneness leads

to anxiety and results in our being related to others. We have to realize that we
are both alone and related to others at the same time. Corey said that for having
fulfilling and nourishing relationship with others, we need to first be able to stand
alone and find our own strength within ourselves.
Group Couuselling and
Other Couuselling
Approaches
8.4.2 Application
Existential approach to psychotherapy can also be used for individual counselling.
It is quite suitable for persons who are distressed, destitute, orphans, who have
no self awareness, etc. A partnership and sharing among the therapist and client
is important. Use of therapist subjectivity, challenging the client, and the need to
be somebody or do something are essential parts in this approach.
Check Your Progress Exercise 9
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your-answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. List the key concepts of existential counselling approach.
8.5 INDIAN PSYCHOTHERAPY AND
COUNSELLING
Psychotherapy in India started in ancient times. Its origin is traced to about 2000
BC (Veerashwar, 2002). Ayurveda and Yoga contribute largely to the Indian
Ayurveda, which started with Vedas about 600BC and Patanjali's Yoga started
about 150 BC. A deep research in this domain, though now initiated by some,
needs to be highly strengthened by good research work, in the second year of
this programme of study [M.Sc. (CFf)J you will learn more about the applications
of Yoga and meditation in the field of counselling and family therapy.
In this section, we will try to understand the Indian psychotherapy system. In the
world over, tensions and stress are engripping the human force leading to major
or minor physical or mental health problems. Use, understanding and practice of
yoga in daily life helps to live a healthy life. Indian psychotherapy is using the
scientific facts with the art of living. It is a philosophy. it is not promoting magic
or the mystique. According to Prakash Veereshwar (2002) : Indian philosophy is
of Advait (Absolute monism) which has given the concept of 'Shoonyta' or the
great void. 'Shoonyta' is not negative, is a void which is more 'filled' than all the
plentitudes of the universe. Indian thought understands man as an essentially
luminating Atman being, belonging directly to Brahman or Supreme Being.
According to the Indian thought, there are two problems; one being the endless 93
1
Schools of Counselling sufferings of mankind and second is man's powerful yearning for release from
suffering and attaning ultimate happiness - Moksha or salvation.
Existentialism discussed in the West also to an extent deals with the philosophy
of being or existing which is related to the ancient Indian thought.
There are inherent differencesin Indian and Western psychology and psychotherapy.
It can be distinguished by the fact that most of the Western therapies emphasize
on the self, and are ego-based, while Indian thought denounces the self for
attainment of nirvana and espouses ultimate self detachment. Western thought is
therefore narrow while Eastern thought is vast as it also considers the universe.
Shri M.V. Govindaswami, founder ofNIMHANS, used to say that, "Mahabharata
is a great text book of psychopathology and Gita a great treatise on psychotherapy" .
According to Veereshwar, the Indian psychotherapy has shown the following
trends after 19601
s:
Leaning towards the eternal classic Gita;
Sanction to guru-shishya parampara in therapeutic situation.
• Leaning towards the eternal classic Gita:
The Indian classic on Gita, which largely contains the lessons given by
Lord Krishna, a Hindi deity, rnythologically to Arjuna, enlightens people
to the right and wrong paths, living for the righteous ways, karma and
ultimate happiness. It give strength, encouragement and insight to look
within oneself (Satyananda, 1972);
• The Basic Pattern of Guru-shishya Relationship:
According to therapists like Dhairyam, Carstus and Neki, the gurushishya relationship is most acceptable to Indian patients in therapeutic
relationships. According to Neki (1978), guru is involved in the whole
process more actively and takes the whole burden of decision upon
himself and gives insight to the shishya (patient). Guru acts as a therapist,
friend, philosopher and guide in the real school.
For a therapy to be effective, it has to come from the Indian culture (Dr.
E.M. Hock, 1964, a swiss psychotherapist) .
• Now we will discuss the Indian psychotherapy in brief as given by Veereshwar.
It mainly consists of Atharva Veda, Ayurveda and Yoga.
The Vedas
The Vedas are the ancient wisdom of India, coand are ntaining philosophy, art and
science of living. There are four Vedas, which are:-
Rig Veda - It is in prose form and gives methods of performing yagyas.
Sam Veda - It is in singable lyrical form and deals with the ways to fight the
elements disturb yajya and also appeases various vedic gods.
Atharva Veda - It contains worldly problems and their solutions. This veda is
consulted for psychotherapy in India. It is practical and psychological in nature.
it provides solutions to everyday needs and problems.
94
~
Ayurveda - Ayurveda is the science of life. It presents a holistic, patient-oriented
approach. It studies the patient's, mind and body. It consists of 3 main samhitasCharak Sarnhita, Sushruta Sarnhita and Ashtanj Sangrha.
Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Approaches
Charak Samhita contains description of various mental and physical diseases.
Sushruta Samhita deals with the medicine and surgery. Ashtanga Sangrha of
Vagabhatta is the combination of eight branches of Ayurveda for treatment of
mental disorders.
Yoga - Yoga is gaining wide popularity the world over. Yoga is used as a relaxation
technique and exercise by the therapists. Yoga means to unite. Tenets advocated
by Maharishi Patanjali are mainly applied today. Yoga helps to boost ego strength
and improve complete wellness among the humans.
8.6 ELECTRIC APPROACH TO COUNSELLING
Electric approach to counselling or integrated approach to counselling is using
more than one specific approach in the psychotherapeutic process. The therapist
should have clear reasons for the usage of more than one therapy. Counsellor
should be able to define the goals of integrated approach to counselling, give
direct reasons for using different approaches and what one wants to achieve by
it should be clearly hypothesized.
Always remember that all counselling and psychotherapeutic approaches want to
change their client for good. They all differ in the approach and method to help
their client. While deciding upon which technique is to be used, cost effectiveness
in terms of time, human resources, and number of sessions should be kept in
mind. All therapies are effective and all approaches are considered to change the
patient or help the client and also the client believes that she or he shall change
with this approach. All approaches emphasize on an honest relationship, clear
understanding, empathy for client. All the approaches are diverse in their method
to help the patient or cure the symptoms. Compatibility of approaches in an
electric approach should be thoroughly considered. In the end, remember that an
approach in which the counsellor or therapist is well versed should be used and
approach which is most suitable to your client needs to used.
Check Your Progress Exercise 8
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. What do you mean by eclectric approach to counselling?
95
/
Schools of Counselling 8.7 LET US SUM UP
In this Unit, we studied that:
• We are all born and live in some kind. of group.
• Group counselling is an effective way of counselling parents of young children,
parents of children with disabilities, alcoholic groups, etc.
• Group psychology is concerned with individual member as a member of a
race, nation, caste or group who have been organized for a definite purpose.
There could be various types of groups like structured groups, religious
group, groups belonging to various age groups like elderly young children,
adolescents, etc.
• Group leader needs to be courageous, has personal power to influence,
emotionally present to be with others, willingness for self confrontation,
sincerity,authenticity,sense of identity,belief in group process and enthusiasm,
inventiveness and creativity to approach the group.
• Transactional analysis approach is basically a group counselling approach.
The personality structure is made of three ego states, namely, the parent ego
state, the adult ego state and the child ego state.
• Transactional analysis approach emphasizes the use of strokes, injunctions
and counter-injunctions during childhood which lay the foundation of our
personality.Understanding of the fact that the decisions taken during childhood
could be reversed leads to redecisions and change to being 'OK'. I, others,
OK and not Ok are the key words in this approach.
• Existential approach lay emphasis on being or ought to be. The realization
of the self-awareness, self-determination and to lay responsibility on self for
what we are today would lead to change. Anxiety produced in the fact of
death and non-being gives search to the meaning of our existence. One has
to re-define our quest of 'why', 'where', and 'how'. What questions to lead
an authentic life leading to self actualization.
• Eclectric approach to counselling or integration of various approaches should
be carefully planned after understanding the clients need. Clear goals and
hypothesis should be formulated.
8.8 GLOSSARY
Adult ego state Ego state which processes information and
take decisionsin a realistic way in one's brain.
Child ego state Ego state consisting of emotions, feelings and
impulsive Desires.
Group counsellorreveals personalinformation
about oneself to the group.
Disclosing oneself
Existential anxiety Anxiety as a result of change or desire to
become what we are capable of.
96
1
Group leader
Parent ego state
Group counsellor or g:rouptherapist.
Ego state consisting of attitudes and behaviour
incorporated from external sources primarily
one's parents.
Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Approaches
Restating Repeating what the speaker said in different
words.
Summarizing Putting together important elements.
Tenninating Closing or ending the group sessions.
8.9 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1. According to Le Bon, psychological group is a coalition of heterogeneous
individuals which are combined for a cause or purpose to work as a whole
unified unit for a given reason or cause.
2. McDougall described a group as a 'crowd' that fulfills certain conditions.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
1.
•
Some of groups usually found are :
• Mahila mandal group,
•
Panchayati group,
•
lIT - Training group,
•
Residents welfare association,
•
Self help groups, and
.' Anonymous group.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1. Multi-cultural context means when group members belong to different races,
cultures, ethnicity or religions.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
1.
i) Emotional presence,
ii) Personal power,
iii) Courage,
iv) Willingness to confront oneself,
v) Sincerity and authenticity,
vi) Sense of identity,
vii) Belief in group process and enthusiasm, and
viii) Inventiveness and creativity. 97
I
Schools of Counselling Check Your Progress Exercise 5
1. a) Modeling: Modeling is a skill of the group leader. Through modeling or
being a role model to the group, the group leader can foster those
qualities in the group members which she or he wants the group to
imbibe.
b) Evaluating: The group leader needs to evaluate the group as a whole,
the individual members of the group and the group process. It is also
a skill of a group leader.
c) Interpreting: Interpreting is a skill of a good group leader. It means to
interpret group members' behaviour, feelings, thoughts, emotions or
expenences.
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
1. Following are the four stages of group formation:
i) Initial stage - Orientation and exploration
ii) Transition stage - Dealing with resistance
iii) Working stage - Cohesion and productivity
iv) Final stage: Consolidation and termination
Check Your Progress Exercise 7
1. According to Berne, diagrammatic presentation of the personality structure
is given below:
Parent Ego state0
Adult Ego state 0
Child Ego state @)
2. Strokes can be both positive or negative. They are the verbal and non-verbal
communication received from primarily the parents and also others in the
group. Positive strokes have a positive impact on the individual while negative
strokes have a negative impact.
Check Your Progress Exercise 8
1. The Gouldings and Berne differ in decisions and redecisions approach in
transactional analysis. The Gouldings believe that the child takes the decisions
based on their perception, fantasy and understanding of what parents say
and this understanding during adulthood leads to redecisions at an adult level.
On the other hand, Berne believed that the child as young was not taking
decisions but receiving the same from their parents.
Check Your Progress Exercise 9
1. The key concepts of existential counseling approach are given below:
i) Self-awareness,
98
ii) Self-determination and personal responibility,
iii) Existential anxiety,
~I
iv) Death and non-being,
v) The search for meaning,
vi) The search for authenticity, and
vii) Aloneness and relatedness.
Check Your Progress Exercise 10
1. The eclectric approach to counselling means to use more than one approach
while dealingwith a client.It isthe integrationof various counsellingapproaches
as per the need. The goals of therapy have to be clear and hypothesization
done before starting the therapy.
Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Approaches
8.10 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. What are the skills and characteristics you should develop as a group
counsellor? Support your answer with examples.
2. 'I am OK - You are not OK'. What do you understand by this statement.
Discuss your answer from theoretical perspectives.
3. 'Anita has been admitted to a women's home. She has no home to go and
most of the time she is crying. She has not been able to cope up with sewing
classes in which she was sent. She does not talk to the other group members.
She remains alone and within herself' .
In the above situation, what approach to counselling you would use? Give
reasons to support your answer. Also describe the procedure you would
follow in the psycho-therapeutic process.
Goulding, M. (1987). Transactional analysis and redecision therapy. In lK. Zeig
(Ed.), The evolution of psychotherapy (pp. 285 - 299). New York: Brunner/
Maze!' 99
8.11 FURTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES
Berne, E. (1964). Games people play. New York: Grove Press.
Berne, E. (1961). Transactional analysis in psychotherapy. New York: Grove
Press.
Berne, E. (1972). What do-you say after you say hello? New York: Grove
Press.
Corey, G. (1990). Theory and practice of group counseling. California: Brooks/
Cole Publishing Company.
Frankl, V. (1963). Man's search for meaning. New York: Washington Square
Press.
Freud, S. (1949). Group psychology and the analysis of the ego. Translation
by James Strachey and edited by Ernest Jones. 5th Impression. London: The
Hogarth Press, 42 William Street, W.C. 2 and the Institute of Psychoanalysis.
Goulding, M. & Goulding, R. (1979). Changing lives through redecision therapy.
New York: BrunnerlMazel.
Schools of Counselling Goulding, R & Goulding, M. (1976). Injunctions, decisions and redecisions.
.Transactional Analysis Journal, 6(1), 41 - 48.
Kierkegaord quoted in Theory and practice of group counselling, 4th Edition,
By Gerald Corey, 1990, California: Wadsworth, Inc.
Keen, E. (1970). Three faces of being: Toward an existential clinical
psychology. New York: Appleton - Century - Crafts.
Karpman, S. (1968). Fairy tales and script drama analysis. Transactional Analysis
Bulleting, 7(26), 39 - 43.
Lakin, M. (1985). The helping group: Therapeutic principles and issues.
Reading, MA: Addison - Wesley.
Le Bon, G. (1895), The Crowd: A study of the popular mind.
http:/onlinebooks.libraryupoenn edu/webbin/gutbook/lookup?num =445. Retrieved
November 15, 2008.
Me Dougall (1920). The group mind. London: Cambridge University Press. ~.
May, R (1983). The discovery of being: Writings in existential psychology.
New York: Norton.
Maslow, A. (1970). Motivation and personality. 2nd Edition, New York: Harper
& Row.
Pedersen P. (1988). A handbook for developing multicultural awareness.
Alexandria, VA: American Association for Counselling and Development.
Patterson, c.H. (1986). Theories of counselling and psychotherapy. 4th Edition.
New York: Harper & Row Publishers Inc.
Rose, S.R (1987). Social skills training in middle childhood: A structured group
approach. Journal for specialists in group work, 12 (4), 144 - 149.
Riordan RJ. & Beggs, M.S. (1987). Counsellors and self-help groups. Journal
of Counselling and Development, 65(8), 427-429.
Ricordan, RJ. & Beggs, M.S. (1988). Some critical differences between selfhelp and therapy groups. Journalfor specialists in group work, 3(1).24 - 29.
Russell, J.M. (1978). Sartre, therapy and expanding the concept of responsibility.
The American Journal of Psychoanalysis, 38, 259 - 269.
Steriner, C. (1974). Scripts People live. NY: Grove Press.
Sue, D.W. (1978). Eliminating cultural oppression in counseling: Toward a general
theory. Journal of Counselling Psychology, 25, 419 - 428.
Sue, D.W. (1981). Counselling the culturally different: Theory and Practice.
New York: Wiley.
Steiner, C. (1974). Scripts people live: Transactional analysis of life scripts
(pp.1O-132). New York: Grove Press.
Steiner, C. (1967). A script checklist. Transactional Analysis Bulletin, 6(22),
38 - 39.
100
...
Sartre, J.P. (1971). Being and nothingness. New York: Bantam.
Tillich, P. (1952). The courage to be. New Haven, C'l'; Yale University Press.
Unwin, F. (1920). The Crowd: A study of the popular mind. 12th Impression.
Yalom, I.D. (1980). Existential psychotherapy. New York: Basic Books.
Group Counselling and
Other Counselling
Approaches
101

NOTES
/
I
lVICFT-003
COUNSELLING AND FAMILY THERAPY: BASIC CONCEPTS
AND THEORETICAL PERSPECTIVES
BLOCK 1
Unit I
Unit 2
Unit 3
Unit4
INTRODUCTION TO COUNSELLING AND FAMILY THERAPY
Counselling: Meaning, Scope and Applications
Family Therapy: Meaning, Scope and Applications
Career Counselling
Family Theories in Practice
BLOCK 2 SCHOOLS OF COUNSELLING
Unit 5
Unit 6
Unit 7
Unit 8
Psychodynamic Approaches
Cognitive- Behavioural Approaches
Person-Centred Approaches
Group Counselling and other Counselling Approaches
15LO(:I(3 SC1{00LS OF E<\NHLY1'HERAPY
Unit ')
Unir 10 SC1lution FOC'.b<.;'d and S!Cdlt:gi<: Family Therapy
Structural Fnmily
12 Cognitive Behavioural Family Therapy
Unl! I~\
BLOCK 4 MODALITlES OF COUNSELLING AND FAMILY THERAPY
Unit14
Unit 15
Unit 16
Unit 17
Unit 18
Family Interviewing
Crisis Intervention
Supportive Counselling
Psychoeducation
Social Skills Therapy
MANUAL FOR SUPERVISED PR.ACTICUM (MCFTL-003)
/I
MPDD-IGNOUlP.O.2T1March.2011
ISBN - 978-81-266-5213-6
/
